Inpixon: NASDAQ:INPX quotes & news - Google FinanceMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreDocsBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceMore resultsInpixon(NASDAQ:INPX)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Inpixon  (Public, NASDAQ:INPX)  
Watch this stock
 
Find more results for
INPX



















0.530


-0.039
(-6.81%)





Real-time:
 

12:13PM EDT



NASDAQ
real-time data -
Disclaimer

Currency in USD







Range

0.50 - 0.57



52 week

0.50 - 11.08



Open

0.56



Vol / Avg.

156,798.00/883,419.00



Mkt cap

1.29M



P/E

    -



Div/yield

    -



EPS

-15.07



Shares

2.44M



Beta

1.69



Inst. own

5%
































News





Relevance



Date











All news for Inpixon »

Subscribe






Advertisement


Key stats and ratios




Q1 (Mar '17)
2016


Net profit margin
-44.86%
-50.30%

Operating margin
-39.72%
-44.62%

EBITD margin
-
-18.16%

Return on average assets
-40.07%
-39.57%

Return on average equity
-3139.69%
-188.73%

Employees
121
-

CDP Score
-

-


Screen stocks with similar metrics »

Address
2479 E Bayshore Rd Ste 195PALO ALTO, CA 94303-3245United States
- Map+1-408-7022167 (Phone)+1-408-8241543 (Fax)

Website links


https://inpixon.com/



External links

Analyst Estimates - MarketWatch
SEC Filings - EDGAR Online
Major Holders - MSN Money
Research Reports - Reuters















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view



Volume delayed by 15 mins.Prices are not from all markets.

Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel







Sector: Technology > Industry: IT Services & Consulting - NEC

More from FactSet »










Description




Inpixon, formerly Sysorex Global, provides data analytics and location-based solutions and services to commercial and government customers across the world. The Company operates through four segments: Mobile, IoT & Big Data Products, which includes its AirPatrol product line and on-premise big data appliance product; Storage and Computing, which includes third-party hardware, software and related maintenance/warranty products and services that the Company resells; SaaS Revenues, which provides software-as-a-services or Internet-based hosted services, and Professional Services, which offers general information technology (IT) services. Its products and services include LightMiner Analytics Platform, Data Science and Advanced Analytics Consulting Services, AirPatrol for Security, AirPatrol for Retail, Shoom Product Line, Enterprise Infrastructure Solutions and Services, and IT Services.


More from Reuters »








Officers and directors





Nadir Ali

Chief Executive Officer, Director





Age: 46

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Wendy Loundermon

Principal Financial and Accounting Officer





Age: 46

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Geoffrey Lilien

Chief Executive Officer of Lilien Systems, Director





Age: 51

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Soumya Das

Chief Marketing Officer






Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Abdul-Aziz Salloum

General Manager of Sysorex Arabia





Age: 54

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Kareem M. Irfan

Independent Director





Age: 55

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Tanveer A. Khader

Independent Director





Age: 47

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Leonard A. Oppenheim Esq.

Independent Director





Age: 67

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters

Thomas L. Steding

Independent Director





Age: 71

Bio & Compensation
 - Reuters



Full list on Reuters »








Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service




MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Sales


Steel and Iron


Taxes


Earnings


Health Care


Banks and Banking




Credit


Ice


Markets


Politics and Government


Production


Gas Prices




Russia


Oil


U.S. Politics


Europe


London Markets


Architecture






People in the news



Li Ka-Shing


Musk, Elon


Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


David, George


George, David




Greenspan, Alan


Wilson, Michael


Gold, Howard


Hussein


Cook, Tim


Dauman, Philippe




Clarke, Andrew


Gates, Bill


Miles, David


Rodriguez, Alex


Disney, Walt


Martin, John






Companies in the news



Clorox Co.


Aetna Inc.


Performance


New York Mercantile Exchange


United Health Services


University Health Services




The Irvine


Capital One Financial


Communications Workers of America


Best Buy Co. Inc.


Kraft Foods Inc


Staples Inc.




Wal-Mart Stores


Whole Foods Market


Travel


Morgan Stanley


Facebook


International Data Group






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


OPEC


Securities and Exchange Commission


University of California


University of Pennsylvania


University of Southern California




University of Washington


Washington University


Bank of England


European Union


Nasdaq Stock Market


World Bank




Congress


University of Michigan


World Health Organization


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Federal Reserve Board


European Central Bank












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




12:31 PM EDT
August 3, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
12:31pOil trader Andy Hall closes hedge fund after nearly 30% loss in 2017: report
12:26pPound slides after BOE stands pat on rates; dollar remains under pressure
12:25pClothes, meat, champagne and electronics — coming to a vending machine near you
12:23pBipartisan Senate bill would require Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac to use alternative credit scores
12:22pEuropean stocks end with gains, powered by Next, UniCredit
12:17pNASA’s new ‘planetary protection officer’ will probably make way more than people who actually go to space 
12:11pMore than half of women who got an abortion last year were using contraception
12:09pFitbit shares rocket 15% as analysts bet on smartwatch launch
12:08pCBS taps Facebook executive for digital ad push
12:08pAetna profit up on price hikes, raises outlook
12:07pKering drops Alibaba suit, forms new partnership
12:06pFed’s Rosengren says ‘taper tantrum’ unlikely to result from shrinking balance sheet
12:06pTeva shares plummet 21% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
12:05pTesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
12:03pSnap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversary
12:00pHere’s your best stock-market move after Dow 22,000
11:59aFTSE 100 jumps, but pound slides as Bank of England cuts growth outlook 
11:47aCongress wouldn’t do it, so Fannie and Freddie reformed themselves
11:41aDow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
11:33aTreasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
22,024.49

+8.25
+0.04%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,351.97

-10.68
-0.17%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.83

-4.74
-0.19%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15


















































10-K: SYSOREX GLOBAL - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

22,025
+8.42
+0.04%






Nasdaq

6,352
-10.64
-0.17%






S&P 500

2,473
-4.72
-0.19%









12:30 P.M. ET


                                  Oil trader Andy Hall closes hedge fund after nearly 30% loss in 2017: report
                                





 
12:26 P.M. ET


Updated
      Pound slides after BOE stands pat on rates; dollar remains under pressure
                                





 
12:25 P.M. ET


Updated
      Clothes, meat, champagne and electronics — coming to a vending machine near you
                                





 
12:22 P.M. ET


Updated
      Bipartisan Senate bill would require Fannie Mae, Freddie Mac to use alternative credit scores
                                





 
12:21 P.M. ET


Updated
      European stocks end with gains, powered by Next, UniCredit
                                





 
12:16 P.M. ET


Updated
      NASA’s new ‘planetary protection officer’ will probably make way more than people who actually go to space 
                                





 
12:10 P.M. ET


Updated
      More than half of women who got an abortion last year were using contraception
                                





 
12:09 P.M. ET


Updated
      Fitbit shares rocket 15% as analysts bet on smartwatch launch
                                





 
12:08 P.M. ET


                                  CBS taps Facebook executive for digital ad push
                                





 
12:07 P.M. ET


                                  Aetna profit up on price hikes, raises outlook
                                





 
12:07 P.M. ET


                                  Kering drops Alibaba suit, forms new partnership
                                





 
12:05 P.M. ET


                                  Fed’s Rosengren says ‘taper tantrum’ unlikely to result from shrinking balance sheet
                                





 
12:05 P.M. ET


Updated
      Teva shares plummet 21% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
                                





 
12:05 P.M. ET


Updated
      Tesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
                                





 
12:02 P.M. ET


Updated
      Snap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversary
                                





 
12:00 P.M. ET


                                  Here’s your best stock-market move after Dow 22,000
                                





 
11:58 A.M. ET


Updated
      FTSE 100 jumps, but pound slides as Bank of England cuts growth outlook 
                                





 
11:47 A.M. ET


                                  Congress wouldn’t do it, so Fannie and Freddie reformed themselves
                                





 
11:41 A.M. ET


Updated
      Dow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
                                





 
11:33 A.M. ET


Updated
      Treasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-K: SYSOREX GLOBAL
    








    By

Published: Mar 30, 2016 4:47 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- ITEM 7: MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS  The following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations should be read in conjunction with the audited financial statements and related notes included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. In addition to historical information, this discussion and analysis here and throughout this Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements that involve risks, uncertainties and assumptions. Our actual results may differ materially from those anticipated in these forward-looking statements, due to a number of factors, including but not limited to, risks described in the section entitled "Risk Factors."  Except where indicated, all share and per share data in this section, as well as the consolidated financial statements, reflect the reverse stock split effected on April 8, 2014.  Overview of Our Business  Sysorex Global ("Sysorex" or the "Company") provides data analytics and indoor-location based solutions and services to commercial and government customers worldwide. We have developed a new kind of discovery platform that blends data from traditional software and network systems with the growing universe of mobile and Internet of Things (IoT). In doing so we have created a high velocity, secure and scalable platform that we believe allows our customers to evaluate their most complex business issues, and compete successfully in their respective markets. Our products are designed to help customers derive real time value by combining both the physical and digital worlds. These products and services operate and report among the following segments: Mobile, IoT & Big Data Products, Storage and Computing, SaaS Revenues, and Professional Services.  Sysorex's data analytics products integrate with our AirPatrol product line, which focuses on collecting data from any wireless device in close proximity (Cellular, WiFi, BLE, RFID, etc.). We believe we can provide the right information at the right time based on our integrated solutions allowing us to uniquely blend the real world and the digital world. We believe that our AirPatrol product line is also well positioned in the Cyber Security market as mobile device management and detection technology. We believe that our location accuracy of sub 10-feet and our ability to capture all RF frequencies is unmatched. Detecting rogue devices that could be a security threat to an enterprise or government agency and then providing accurate location of that device is an important security application for our customers. Our AirPatrol product line has three patents and ten others pending worldwide.  Sysorex also provides supporting products and services including enterprise computing and storage, virtualization, business continuity, data migration; custom application development, networking and information technology business consulting services. These allow Sysorex to offer turnkey solutions when requested by customers.  Our Storage and Computing segment revenues are typically driven by purchase orders that are received on a monthly basis. Approximately 21% of the revenues from these purchase orders are recurring contracts that range from one to five years for warranty and maintenance support. For these contracts the customer is invoiced one time and pays Sysorex upfront for the full term of the warranty and maintenance contract. Revenue from these contracts is determinable ratably over the contract period with the unearned revenue recorded as deferred revenue and amortized over the contract period. We have a 30-year history and a high repeat customer rate of approximately 50-60% annually. Our revenues are diversified over hundreds of customers and typically no one customer exceeds 15% of revenues however from time to time a large order from a customer could put it temporarily above 15%. We have one customer that was approximately 25% for the year ending December 31, 2015 but we don't anticipate that this customer will continue to maintain that percentage as our revenues expand across other customers in 2016. Management believes this diversification provides stability to our revenue streams.  Our Software-as-a-Service (SaaS) contracts are typically performed for periods of one or more years and we have a high customer retention rate. Sysorex SaaS product include: eTearsheets, invoicing, CRM, and other products and services to approximately 675 newspapers in the Cloud. Cloud or SaaS based analytics is a growing market that Sysorex intends to pursue beyond the media vertical that we are in today.  Our Mobile, IoT and Big Data sales are expected to grow significantly in 2016; however sales cycles proved to be longer than we expected in 2015. The long sales cycles result from customer related issues such as budget and procurement processes but also because of the early stages of indoor-locationing technology and the learning curve required for customers to implement such solutions. This is improving with the increased presence and awareness of beacon and wi-fi locationing technologies in the market.  Our Professional Services group provides consulting services ranging from enterprise architecture design to custom application development to data modeling. Sysorex offers a full scope of information technology development and implementation services. With expertise in a broad range of IT practices including project design and management, systems integration, outsourcing, independent validation and verification, cyber security and more.  Events such as budget impasses and sequestration in the federal government could impact government customer funding for projects that our IT Government segment is pursuing by delaying payment or decisions on contract/task order awards, as the Company has experienced with prior awards. However, our government contracts are currently approximately 12% of our total revenues. Such government contracts typically have a three to five year term and we believe that our recent government contract revenues will be indicative of future government contract based revenues.  Recent Events  Reverse Stock-Split  In connection with the Company's initial public offering described below and in order to satisfy the initial listing requirements for The Nasdaq Capital Market, on April 8, 2014 the Company filed a Certificate of Amendment to its Articles of Incorporation (the "Certificate of Amendment") with the Secretary of State of the State of Nevada to effect a one-for-two reverse split of the Company's common stock, with no reduction in authorized capital.  April 2014 Initial Public Offering  On April 9, 2014, in connection with an offering (the "Offering") by the Company of an aggregate of 3,333,333 shares (the "Shares") of the Company's common stock, at a price to the public of $6.00 per Share, including 166,667 shares sold by a selling stockholder, the Company entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with Wellington Shields & Co. LLC, and Dougherty & Co. LLC. (collectively, the "Underwriters"), with respect to the sale by the Company and the purchase by the Underwriters of the Shares. The Shares were registered for offer and sold pursuant to an effective Registration Statement on Form S-1 (File No. 333-191648) and a related prospectus.  On April 15, 2014, upon the closing of the Offering, the Company received approximately $16.6 million from the sale of 3,166,666 Shares in the Offering, excluding the Shares sold by the selling stockholder, after deducting the underwriting discounts, fees and commissions. The net proceeds of the Offering were used in connection with the acquisition of AirPatrol and will also be used to expand the Company's sales and marketing efforts, including expanding its Washington, D.C. office, for future strategic acquisitions, and for working capital and other general corporate purposes.  Nasdaq Listing  On April 10, 2014, in connection with the offering of the Shares described above, the Company's common stock began trading on The Nasdaq Capital Market, under the symbol "SYRX."  September 2015 Public Offering  On September 25, 2015, the Company entered into an underwriting agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") with B. Riley & Co., LLC, as representative of the several underwriters named therein (the "Underwriters"), relating to the issuance and sale of 5,250,000 shares of the Company common stock, par value $0.001 per share. The price to the public in this offering was $1.00 per share. Under the terms of the Underwriting Agreement, the Company also granted the Underwriters an option, exercisable for 30 days from the closing date, to purchase up to an additional 787,500 shares at the public offering price. The offering was made pursuant to the Company's registration statement on Form S-3 (Registration Statement No. 333-204159) filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission and declared effective May 28, 2015 and a related prospectus supplement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  The offering closed September 30, 2015. After deducting underwriting discounts and commissions and offering expenses, the net proceeds from the offering were approximately $4.7 million. The net proceeds from the offering were used for general corporate purposes, which included business development activities, capital expenditures, working capital and general and administrative expenses.  JOBS Act  Pursuant to Section 107 of the JOBS Act, emerging growth companies may delay adopting new or revised accounting standards until such time as those standards apply to private companies. We have irrevocably elected to opt out of this exemption from new or revised accounting standards and, therefore, will be subject to the same new or revised accounting standards as other public companies that are not emerging growth companies.  Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates  Our consolidated financial statements are prepared in accordance with U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, or GAAP. In connection with the preparation of our consolidated financial statements, we are required to make assumptions and estimates about future events, and apply judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenue, expenses and the related disclosures. We base our assumptions, estimates and judgments on historical experience, current trends and other factors that management believes to be relevant at the time our consolidated financial statements are prepared. On a regular basis, we review the accounting policies, assumptions, estimates and judgments to ensure that our consolidated financial statements are presented fairly and in accordance with GAAP. However, because future events and their effects cannot be determined with certainty, actual results could differ from our assumptions and estimates, and such differences could be material.  Our significant accounting policies are discussed in Note 2 of the audited financial statements for the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014. We believe that the following accounting estimates are the most critical to aid in fully understanding and evaluating our reported financial results, and they require our most difficult, subjective or complex judgments, resulting from the need to make estimates about the effect of matters that are inherently uncertain. There have been no changes to estimates during the periods presented in the filing. Historically changes in management estimates have not been material.  Revenue Recognition  We provide IT solutions and services to customers with revenues currently derived primarily from the sale of third-party hardware and software products, software, assurance, licenses and other consulting services, including maintenance services. The products and services we sell, and the manner in which they are bundled, are technologically complex and the characterization of these products and services require judgment in order to apply revenue recognition policies. For all of these revenue sources, we determine whether we are the principal or agent in accordance with Accounting Standards Codification Topic, 605-45 Principal Agent Considerations.  We allocate the total arrangement consideration to the deliverables based on an estimated selling price of our products and services and report revenues containing multiple deliverable arrangements under ASC 605-25 "Revenue Arrangements with Multiple Deliverables" ("ASC-605-25"). These multiple deliverable arrangements primarily consist of the following deliverables:  We recognize revenue when the following criteria are met (1) persuasive evidence of an arrangement exists; (2) shipment (software or hardware) or fulfillment (maintenance) has occurred and applicable services have been rendered, (3) the sales price is fixed or determinable, and (4) collectability is reasonably assured. Generally, these criteria are met upon shipment to customers with respect to the sales of hardware and software products. With respect to our maintenance and other service agreements, this criteria is met once the service has been provided. Revenue from the sales of our services on time and material contracts is recognized based on a fixed hourly rate as direct labor hours are expended. We recognize revenue for sales of all services on a fixed fee ratably over the term of the arrangement as such services are provided. The Company evaluates whether the revenues it receives from the sale of hardware and software products, licenses, and services, including maintenance and professional consulting services, should be recognized on a gross or net basis on a transaction by transaction basis. We maintain primary responsibility for the materials and procedures utilized to service our customers, even in connection with the sale of third party-products and maintenance services as we are responsible for the fulfillment and acceptability of the products and services purchased by our customers. In addition, the nature of the products sold to our customers are such that they need configuration in order to be utilized properly for the purposes intended by the customer and therefore we assume certain responsibility for product staging, configuration, installation, modification, and integration with other client systems, or retain general inventory risk upon customer return or rejection. Our customers rely on us to develop the appropriate solutions and specifications applicable to their specific systems and then integrate any such required products or services into their systems. As described above, we are responsible for the day to day maintenance and warranty services provided in connection with all of our existing customer relationships, whether such services are ultimately provided directly by the Company and its employees or by the applicable third party service provider. As of the date of this filing, after an evaluation of all of our existing customer relationships, we have concluded that we are the primary obligor to all of our existing customers and therefore recognize all revenues on a gross basis.  Long-lived Assets  We account for our long-lived assets in accordance with Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") 360, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets" ("ASC 360"), which requires that long-lived assets be evaluated whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be recoverable or the useful life has changed. Some of the events or changes in circumstances that would trigger an impairment test include, but are not limited to:  ? significant under-performance relative to expected and/or historical results (negative comparable sales growth or operating cash flows for two consecutive years);  ? significant negative industry or economic trends;  ? knowledge of transactions involving the sale of similar property at amounts below our carrying value; or  ? our expectation to dispose of long-lived assets before the end of their estimated useful lives, even though the assets do not meet the criteria to be classified as "held for sale."  Long-lived assets are grouped for recognition and measurement of impairment at the lowest level for which identifiable cash flows are largely independent of the cash flows of other assets. The impairment test for long-lived assets requires us to assess the recoverability of our long-lived assets by comparing their net carrying value to the sum of undiscounted estimated future cash flows directly associated with and arising from our use and eventual disposition of the assets. If the net carrying value of a group of long-lived assets exceeds the sum of related undiscounted estimated future cash flows, we would be required to record an impairment charge equal to the excess, if any, of net carrying value over fair value.  When assessing the recoverability of our long-lived assets, which include property and equipment and finite-lived intangible assets, we make assumptions regarding estimated future cash flows and other factors. Some of these assumptions involve a high degree of judgment and also bear a significant impact on the assessment conclusions. Included among these assumptions are estimating undiscounted future cash flows, including the projection of comparable sales, operating expenses, capital requirements for maintaining property and equipment and residual value of asset groups. We formulate estimates from historical experience and assumptions of future performance, based on business plans and forecasts, recent economic and business trends, and competitive conditions. In the event that our estimates or related assumptions change in the future, we may be required to record an impairment charge. Based on our evaluation we did not record a charge for impairment for the years ended December 31, 2015 and, 2014.  We evaluate the remaining useful lives of long-lived assets and identifiable intangible assets whenever events or circumstances indicate that a revision to the remaining period of amortization is warranted. Such events or circumstances may include (but are not limited to): the effects of obsolescence, demand, competition, and/or other economic factors including the stability of the industry in which we operate, known technological advances, legislative actions, or changes in the regulatory environment. If the estimated remaining useful lives change, the remaining carrying amount of the long-lived assets and identifiable intangible assets would be amortized prospectively over that revised remaining useful life. We have determined that there were no events or circumstances during the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014 which would indicate a revision to the remaining amortization period related to any of our long lived assets. Accordingly, we believe that the current estimated useful lives of long-lived assets reflect the period over which they are expected to contribute to future cash flows and are therefore deemed appropriate.  Goodwill and Indefinite-lived Assets  We have recorded goodwill and other indefinite-lived assets in connection with our acquisitions of Lilien, Shoom, AirPatrol and LightMiner. Goodwill, which represents the excess of acquisition cost over the fair value of the net tangible and intangible assets of the acquired company, is not amortized. Indefinite-lived intangible assets are stated at fair value as of the date acquired in a business combination. Our goodwill balance and other assets with indefinite lives are evaluated for potential impairment during the fourth quarter of each year and in certain other circumstances. The evaluation of impairment involves comparing the current fair value of the business to the recorded value, including goodwill. To determine the fair value of the business, we utilize both the income approach, which is based on estimates of future net cash flows, and the market approach, which observes transactional evidence involving similar businesses. There was no goodwill impairment for the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014.  Deferred Income Taxes  In accordance with ASC 740 "Income Taxes" ("ASC 740"), management routinely evaluates the likelihood of the realization of its income tax benefits and the recognition of its deferred tax assets. In evaluating the need for any valuation allowance, management will assess whether it is more likely than not that some portion, or all, of the deferred tax asset may not be realized. Ultimately, the realization of deferred tax assets is dependent upon the generation of future taxable income during those periods in which temporary differences become deductible and/or tax credits and tax loss carry-forwards can be utilized. In performing its analyses, management considers both positive and negative evidence including historical financial performance, previous earnings patterns, future earnings forecasts, tax planning strategies, economic and business trends and the potential realization of net operating loss carry-forwards within a reasonable timeframe. To this end, management considered (i) that we have had historical losses in the prior years and cannot anticipate generating a sufficient level of future profits in order to realize the benefits of our deferred tax asset; (ii) tax planning strategies; and (iii) the adequacy of future income as of and for the year ended December 31, 2015, based upon certain economic conditions and historical losses through December 31, 2015. After consideration of these factors management deemed it appropriate to establish a full valuation allowance.  A liability for "unrecognized tax benefits" is recorded for any tax benefits claimed in the Company's tax filings that do not meet these recognition and measurement standards. As of December 31, 2015 and 2014, no liability for unrecognized tax benefits was required to be reported. The guidance also discusses the classification of related interest and penalties on income taxes. The Company's policy is to record interest and penalties on uncertain tax positions as a component of income tax expense. No interest or penalties were recorded during the years ended December 31, 2015 and 2014.  Allowance for Doubtful Accounts  We maintain our reserves for credit losses at a level believed by management to be adequate to absorb potential losses inherent in the respective balances. We assign an internal credit quality rating to all new customers and update these ratings regularly, but no less than annually. Management's determination of the adequacy of the reserve for credit losses for our accounts and notes receivable is based on the age of the receivable balance, the customer's credit quality rating, an evaluation of historical credit losses, current economic conditions, and other relevant factors.  As of December 31, 2015 and 2014, allowance for credit losses included an allowance for doubtful accounts of approximately $285,000 and $9,000, respectively, due to the aging of the items greater than 120 days outstanding and other potential non-collections.  Business Combinations  We account for business combinations using the acquisition method of accounting, and accordingly, the assets and liabilities of the acquired business are recorded at their fair values at the date of acquisition. The excess of the purchase price over the estimated fair value is recorded as goodwill. Any changes in the estimated fair values of the net assets recorded for acquisitions prior to the finalization of more detailed analysis, but not to exceed one year from the date of acquisition, will change the amount of the purchase price allocable to goodwill. Any subsequent changes to any purchase price allocations that are material to our consolidated financial results will be adjusted. All acquisition costs are expensed as incurred and in-process research and development costs are recorded at fair value as an indefinite-lived intangible asset and assessed for impairment thereafter until completion, at which point the asset is amortized over its expected useful life. Separately recognized transactions associated with business combinations are generally expensed subsequent to the acquisition date. The application of business combination and impairment accounting requires the use of significant estimates and assumptions.  Upon acquisition, the accounts and results of operations are consolidated as of and subsequent to the acquisition date and are included in our Consolidated Financial Statements from the acquisition date.  Stock-Based Compensation  We account for equity instruments issued to non-employees in accordance with accounting guidance which requires that such equity instruments are recorded at their fair value on the measurement date, which is typically the date the services are performed.  We account for equity instruments issued to employees in accordance with accounting guidance that requires that awards are recorded at their fair value on the date of grant and are amortized over the vesting period of the award. We recognize compensation costs over the requisite service period of the award, which is generally the vesting term of the equity instrument issued.  The Black-Scholes option valuation model is used to estimate the fair value of the options or the equivalent security granted. The model includes subjective input assumptions that can materially affect the fair value estimates. The model was developed for use in estimating the fair value of traded options or warrants. The expected volatility is estimated based on the average of historical volatilities for industry peers.  The principal assumptions used in applying the Black-Scholes model along with the results from the model were as follows:   December 31, December 31, 2015 2014 Risk-free interest rate 1.73% to 2.27% 2.29% to 2.82% Expected life of option grants 7 years 7 years Expected volatility of underlying stock 39.4% to 51.45% 38.1% to 39.4% Dividends - -  Operating Segments  The Company operates in the following business segments:  ? Mobile, IoT & Big Data Products: These products currently include our AirPatrol product line (location-based security and marketing platform for wireless and cellular devices that can detect, monitor and manage the content and behavior of smartphones, tablets and other mobile devices based on their location and user); on-premise big data appliance product (Light Miner Studio "LMS") and will include future Sysorex owned products.  ? Storage and Computing: This segment includes third party hardware, software and related maintenance/warranty products and services that Sysorex resells. It includes but is not limited to products for enterprise computing; storage; virtualization; networking; etc.  ? SaaS Revenues: These are Software-as-a-Services (SaaS) or internet based hosted services including the Shoom product line and cloud based big data analytics services (based on our LMS product) and other data science services; analytics services for AirPatrol products and other managed services on a SaaS basis.  ? Professional Services: These are general IT services including but not limited to: custom application/software design; architecture and development; project management; C4I system consulting; strategic outsourcing; staff augmentation; data center design and operations services; data migration services and other non-SaaS services.  Results of Operations  . . .  Mar 30, 2016  (c) 1995-2016 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


AMC hits record low as unrelentingly poor box office continues to take a toll


Tesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it


Here’s your best stock-market move after Dow 22,000















Most Popular





Dow 22,000 means the worst is yet to come





Apple’s stock could double on the ‘mother of all artificial-intelligence projects’





Why Dow 22,000 is not good news for most Americans





3 reasons a stock-market correction is coming in late summer or early fall





What 'Flash Boys' Brad Katsuyama thinks is killing Wall Street trade




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 
























In the News | Inpixon















































































































TwitterLinkedinFacebookRssEmail 

 
















  
















			In the News		


Inpixon 


			2017-04-27T03:15:32+00:00		



Press Releases and News Mentions
Inpixon Joins ng Connect Program to Advance the Adoption and Development of Indoor Positioning Analytics August 2, 2017 
Inpixon to collaborate with multi-industry open innovation ecosystem founded by Nokia to provide indoor positioning and analytics platform for next generation networks, cloud and IoT technologies
PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon (NASDAQ:INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced its participation in the ng Connect Program, founded by Nokia, to create new high value ... Read more >Inpixon Announces Technology Refresh Deal With Leading Beverage Distributor July 26, 2017 Contract worth over $750K spanning Q2 and Q3 will upgrade customer’s existing infrastructure
PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), an indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced a major infrastructure refresh deal with a worldwide beverage distributor. The contract, worth over $750,000, involves significant server upgrades designed to improve the beverage distributor’s data processing, management capabilities, ... Read more >Inpixon Expanding Offering of Canon USA’s RadPRO SecurPASS Security Screening System July 20, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif. – July 20, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that subsidiary, Inpixon Federal, is partnering with Virtual Imaging, Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of Canon U.S.A., Inc., to improve the safety and security of federal, state and local government correctional facilities.
Together, Inpixon Federal and Virtual ... Read more >Inpixon offerings added to NASA SEWP V Government-wide Strategic Solutions (GSS) for Laptops and Monitors July 17, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif. – July 17, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that subsidiary, Inpixon Federal, has been approved to expand its NASA Solutions for Enterprise-Wide Procurement V (SEWP V) catalog to include offerings that meet the requirements for the Government-wide Strategic Solutions (GSS) for Laptops and Monitors. ... Read more >Inpixon is approved for the Army Consolidated Buy number 25 July 12, 2017 Inpixon was Approved for a Number of Systems, Monitors and Accessories to Support the Army
PALO ALTO, Calif. – July 12, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that subsidiary, Inpixon Federal, has been approved to offer the Army a number of configurations by Fujitsu, Panasonic and Samsung.
The Army Consolidated ... Read more >Winners of the 2017 IoT Security Excellence Award Announced July 6, 2017 Published July 6th 2017 on IoT Evolution.
TMC, a global, integrated media company helping clients build communities in print, in person and online, today announced the winners of the 2017 Security Excellence Award, presented by IoT Evolution Magazine.
The award honors the best, most innovative security  products and solutions released in the last twelve months as judged by ... Read more >Inpixon Completes $6,000,000 Underwritten Public Offering June 30, 2017 PALO ALTO, CA, JUNE 30, 2017 INPIXON (NASDAQ: INPX) (the “Company” or “Inpixon”), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced the closing of its previously announced underwritten public offering of (i) Class A Units, at a price to the public of $1.05 per unit, consisting of 1,849,460 shares of our Common Stock ... Read more >Inpixon Gains Channel Partner Momentum with Indoor Positioning Analytics and Security Offering June 29, 2017 


IT Solutions Firm GDT, Phirelight Security Solutions and Integrated Security Technologies Integrating with Inpixon to Protect Federal Agencies and Organizations from BYOD and IoT Risks




June 29, 2017 10:00 AM Eastern Daylight Time

PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced increasing channel momentum for Inpixon’s leading Indoor Positioning ... Read more >Inpixon Prices $6,000,000 Underwritten Public Offering June 29, 2017 PALO ALTO, CA, JUNE 29, 2017 INPIXON (NASDAQ: INPX) (the “Company” or “Inpixon”), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced the pricing of an underwritten public offering with anticipated gross proceeds of approximately $6,000,000, before deducting underwriting discounts, commissions and other offering expenses. The securities offered by the Company consist of (i) Class ... Read more >Inpixon Launches Underwritten Public Offering June 28, 2017 PALO ALTO, CA, JUNE 28, 2017 INPIXON (NASDAQ: INPX) (the “Company” or “Inpixon”), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced the launch of an underwritten public offering. The securities offered by the Company consist of (i) Class A Units, each consisting of one share of common stock and a warrant to purchase ... Read more >How to get the most out of IoT in your hospital June 27, 2017 
Published June 27th 2017 on HealthcareBusinessTech.
Over the next decade, hospitals will continue increasing their adoption of IoT devices, and see more coming through the doors. It’ll be crucial for IT leaders to identify technology solutions that enable scalable technology infrastructure, risk mitigation and management, and effective ways to draw insights from collected data. In this ... Read more >IoT Security: a Distributed Product Failure for the Ages June 23, 2017 By Swapnil Bhartiya
Published Jun 23rd on OSENetwork.com
A Curious Case of Internet of Things
Last year millions of IoT (Internet of Things) devices were compromised and turned into zombies to launch massive DDoS attacks that brought down a huge chunk of the Internet. Those were  not isolated cases; every week there is a new breach, a new security ... Read more >Inpixon Announces Webinar with Leading Expert to Address Internet of Things Security Risks and Best Practices June 19, 2017 Inpixon Sponsoring 1-hour Webinar Highlighting the Growing Security Concerns and Compliance Challenges Associated with the Internet of Things (IoT) 
 
PALO ALTO, Calif. – June 19, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning analytics company, announced it will be sponsoring a webinar titled, “Protect Your Company from The Internet of Things,” on Tuesday June 20th 2017 from ... Read more >Inpixon Selected by Finance Factors to Protect Consumer Data and Privacy June 12, 2017 Leading Financial Services Firm Will Deploy Inpixon Indoor Positioning Analytics to Mitigate Threats from Rogue Devices, Network Compromise and Data Theft
PALO ALTO, Calif., June 11, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced Finance Factors, Hawaii’s largest locally-owned depository financial services loan company specializing in residential and commercial ... Read more >Inpixon Reports Financial Results For The First Quarter Ended March 31, 2017 And Provides Corporate Update May 11, 2017 Conference Call To Be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
May 11, 2017 4:05 PM Eastern Daylight Time
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2017 and provided an update on corporate developments.
First Quarter 2017 Financial Highlights:

2017 ... Read more >Inpixon Presenting at 2017 STORE Retail Conference May 9, 2017 


CEO Nadir Ali to Lead Session Exploring Latest Technology in Retail Innovation




May 09, 2017 10:00 AM Eastern Daylight Time

PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that CEO Nadir Ali will lead a session at the 2017 STORE retail event taking place May 30 – 31 in ... Read more >IoT Time Podcast: Inpixon IPA May 9, 2017 By Ken Briodagh
Published May 9, 2017 on IoT Evolution.
On this episode of the IoT Time Podcast, Ken Briodagh sits down with Soumya Das CMO of Inpixon to talk about IoT and Indoor GPS technology.
This episode is sponsored by “IoT Time: Evolving Trends in the Internet of Things,” a new book by Ken Briodagh about the ongoing influences shaping ... Read more >Inpixon Announces Purchase Order From Leading Health Insurer May 8, 2017 Providing Infrastructure Platform to Reduce Costs and Help Scale Growing IT Demands 
 
PALO ALTO, Calif. – May 8, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, announced today it received a purchase order of approximately $2.5 million from a leading Fortune 500 health insurer. Inpixon will design and deploy a highly modernized ... Read more >Inpixon To Announce First Quarter 2017 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Thursday, May 11, 2017 May 8, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that it will issue First Quarter 2017 financial results for the period ended March 31, 2017, and provide an update on corporate developments at 4:05pm eastern time on Thursday, May 11, 2017.
Management will host a conference call on ... Read more >Retailers, Time to Catch Up To Amazon Go Before It’s Too Late May 5, 2017 Published May 5, 2017 on Retail TouchPoints.
In gearing up for the opening of the Amazon Go stores, we heard about their delayed opening due to slight technology snafus. While there was a big deal made around the delays, these stores are paving the future of brick-and-mortar shopping. Amazon uses computer vision, deep learning algorithms and ... Read more >Inpixon CMO Soumya Das: Retail Is Shifting — Not Dying May 4, 2017 By Lauryn Chamberlain
 Published May 4, 2017 on GeoMarketing.

It’s simple to understand why indoor positioning can be valuable to brick-and-mortar retailers: By understanding when and how customers move about a store, brands can optimize their layout and improve marketing messages.
But Soumya Das, CMO at indoor positioning analytics provider Inpixon, believes that indoor location solutions haven’t ... Read more >FBI Renews Contract with Inpixon Federal April 18, 2017 Inpixon to provide integration services and solutions to FBI’s IT infrastructure   
PALO ALTO, Calif. – April 18, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that subsidiary, Inpixon Federal, has been awarded a second option year renewal of its Information Technology Acquisition Program (ITAP) contract by the Federal Bureau of Investigation ... Read more >Inpixon Reports Fourth Quarter and 2016 Financial Results And Provides Corporate Update April 17, 2017 Conference Call To Be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2016 and provided an update on corporate developments.
Fourth Quarter 2016 Financial Highlights:

2016 Q4 revenue of $14.5 million
2016 ... Read more >Inpixon To Announce 2016 Fiscal Year End Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Monday, April 17, 2017 April 13, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that it will issue 2016 Fiscal Year End financial results for the period ended December 31, 2016 and provide an update on corporate developments after market close on Monday, April 17, 2017.
Management will host a conference call on ... Read more >Inpixon Announces Appointment of Zaman Khan as President of Inpixon Federal April 11, 2017 Information Technology Veteran Will Lead Expansion and Growth of Government Business Division
PALO ALTO, CA, April 11, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning analytics company, today announced the appointment of Zaman Khan as the President of Inpixon Federal, a subsidiary of Inpixon that provides cutting-edge solutions for federal, state and local government agencies ... Read more >Payless becomes latest victim of retail decline. Can it make a comeback? April 5, 2017 APRIL 5, 2017 – Amanda Hoover, The Christian Science Monitor
Payless ShoeSource announced Tuesday that it has filed for bankruptcy and plans to close 400 underperforming locations. 
Payless ShoeSource joined a growing number of retailers who have made plans to shutter stores or file for bankruptcy as shoppers move away from strip malls and stand-alone stores to in ... Read more >Inpixon and Hewlett Packard Enterprise Announce West Coast Synergy Series March 31, 2017 “Data Center of the Future” seminars debut in San Diego, Seattle and San Francisco
PALO ALTO, Calif., March 31, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, and Hewlett Packard Enterprise (HPE) today announced a series of baseball-themed seminars focused on HPE’s Synergy – a new category of infrastructure that accelerates ... Read more >U.S. Army Extends Contract with Inpixon March 29, 2017 Army Contracting Command – Rock Island Munitions Transportation Management System (MTMS) – contract was renewed for its second ordering period to Inpixon Federal
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that the Army Contracting Command – Rock Island Munitions Transportation Management System (MTMS) – contract was ... Read more >Pulling Visibility from the Airwaves March 20, 2017 By Matt Brunk
Published March 17,2017 on NoJitter.com.
Using indoor positioning analytics from Inpixon, organizations can optimize processes based on how people and assets move around their environments.
If you’re looking to better understand the movement of people and assets in your environment, positioning metrics from Inpixon can help.
Inpixon (formerly Sysorex) provides an unobtrusive indoor positioning analytics solution ... Read more >Inpixon Compliant With NASDAQ Listing Requirement March 17, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif. – March 17, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced it has received notice from NASDAQ that Inpixon has regained compliance with NASDAQ minimum closing bid price listing rule 5550(a)(2) and other applicable requirements as required for listing on The Nasdaq Stock Market.
On March ... Read more >Inpixon to Present at ROTH Capital Partners 29th Annual Growth Stock Conference on March 15, 2017 March 13, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif. – March 13, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced Nadir Ali, CEO, will be a featured presenter at the ROTH Capital Partners 29th Annual Growth Stock Conference on Wednesday, March 15, 2017 at 10:00 AM Pacific Time in PINK – SALON 5 at ... Read more >Inpixon Selects PAN Communications as Integrated Marketing & PR Agency of Record March 8, 2017 Indoor Positioning and Data Analytics Leader Partners with PAN to Implement Content Marketing and Media Relation Strategies for Increased Brand Visibility 
SAN FRANCISCO — March 8, 2017 — PAN Communications, an integrated marketing and PR agency for the B2B and healthcare technology industries, has been named the agency of record for Inpixon, a leader in Indoor Positioning ... Read more >Inpixon to Participate in Panel at RetailLoco Event during South by Southwest 2017 March 7, 2017 Session will explore latest in retail innovation, location and cross device attribution
PALO ALTO, CA, March 7, 2017 – Inpixon (NASDAQ: INPX), a leading indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that Chief Marketing Officer Soumya Das will be a panelist at the 2017 RetailLoco event taking place March 12, 2017 during South by Southwest® ... Read more >Sysorex Rebrands to Inpixon, Signifying Increased Focus on Indoor Positioning Analytics March 1, 2017 Delivers GPS for the indoors; Harnesses powerful analytics to modernize the brick-and-mortar market; Creates security dome to keep unauthorized devices off the enterprise premises 
PALO ALTO, CA, March 1, 2017 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it has re-branded the organization to Inpixon. The Company’s common stock will begin trading on The Nasdaq Capital Market (“Nasdaq”) ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Favorable Decision from the Nasdaq Hearings Panel February 28, 2017 Effects Reverse Stock Split and Name Change to Inpixon 
PALO ALTO, CA, – February 28, 2017 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that it has received written notification that the Nasdaq Hearings Panel (the “Panel”) has granted the Company’s request for continued listing on the Nasdaq Capital Market, ... Read more >Sysorex Named to 2017 CRN MSP Elite 150 List February 23, 2017 
Recognized for cutting edge approaches to delivering managed services
PALO ALTO, Calif., February 23, 2017 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that CRN®, a brand of The Channel Company, has named Sysorex to its 2017 Managed Service Provider (MSP) 500 list in the Elite 150 category. This annual list ... Read more >Sysorex Appoints Soumya Das as Chief Marketing Officer January 17, 2017 PALO ALTO, Calif., January 17, 2017 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: INPX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that Soumya Das has joined the company as Chief Marketing Officer. Based in Palo Alto, Das will lead Sysorex’s global marketing organization, with a focus on building the company’s brand and introducing Sysorex’s products to a ... Read more >Sysorex Launches 3-Part “Freethinkers of the Retail World” Webinar Series December 19, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif., December 19, 2016 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced the launch of its 3-part webinar series titled “Freethinkers of the Retail World.”
The webinar series, to kick off in early January 2017, will address challenges facing the retail industry during the ongoing and increasing popularity of ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Pricing of $2.0 Million Registered Direct Offering December 12, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) (the “Company”), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it has entered into definitive agreements with institutional investors for an offering of shares of common stock with gross proceeds of approximately $2.0 million in a registered direct offering. The closing of the offering ... Read more >Sysorex Announces the Closing of Integrio Acquisition November 29, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif., November 29, 2016 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, is pleased to announce that it has completed the acquisition of certain assets of Integrio Technologies, an IT integration and engineering company providing cutting-edge solutions for federal, state and local government agencies, subject to novation of ... Read more >Sysorex To Present At The 9th Annual LD Micro Conference on December 6, 2016 November 29, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif., November 29, 2016– Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will be a featured presenter at the 9th annual LD Micro Main Event Conference. Sysorex CEO, Nadir Ali, will present the Company’s business model and growth strategies on Tuesday, December 6, 2016 at 2:00PM ... Read more >Sysorex Reports Financial Results For The Third Quarter Ended September 30, 2016 November 14, 2016 
PALO ALTO, Calif. — Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2016.
Third Quarter 2016 Financial Highlights:

2016 Q3 revenue of $11.2 million
2016 Q3 gross margin of 28%
2016 Q3 GAAP net loss of $0.18 per share
2016 Q3 GAAP net loss of ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Intent to Purchase Certain Assets of Integrio Technologies, LLC November 14, 2016 
Accretive Acquisition Expected to Expand Sysorex’s Customer Base

PALO ALTO, Calif. — Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high-performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it has signed a definitive Asset Purchase Agreement to acquire certain assets of Integrio Technologies Inc. (Integrio). The total purchase price for the assets will consist of $1.8 million in cash, ... Read more >Sysorex to Announce Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Monday, November 14, 2016 November 7, 2016 
PALO ALTO, Calif. — Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will issue Third Quarter 2016 financial results for the period ended September 30, 2016 and provide an update on corporate developments at 4:05pm Eastern Time on Monday, November 14, 2016.
Management will host a conference call on ... Read more >Sysorex To Present At The Aegis Capital Growth Conference on Wednesday, September 21, 2016 September 16, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high-performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it will be a featured presenter at the Aegis Capital Growth Conference, being held September 20-22, 2016 at the Encore at Wynn in Las Vegas, NV. Nadir Ali, CEO will present the Company’s business model and growth strategies on ... Read more >Sysorex Announces AirPatrol Contract With Top Mall Operator September 8, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it has secured an AirPatrol for Retail Properties managed services contract with a top mall operator.
Sysorex’s AirPatrol for Retail Properties product will be live in a marquee shopping center and provide detailed visitor analytics, including foot counts, visitor ... Read more >Sysorex Reports Financial Results For The Second Quarter Ended June 30, 2016 August 11, 2016 Conference Call To Be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2016.
Second Quarter 2016 Financial Highlights:

2016 Q2 revenue of $13.3 million
2016 Q2 gross margin of 26%
2016 Q2 GAAP net loss ... Read more >Sysorex to Announce Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Thursday, August 11, 2016 August 4, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will issue Second Quarter 2016 financial results for the period ended June 30, 2016 and provide an update on corporate developments at 4:05pm eastern time on Thursday, August 11, 2016.
Management will host a conference call ... Read more >Sysorex Launches Shoom ePublication Platform July 13, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – July 13, 2016 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced the release of ePublication, the latest component in its Shoom eSolutions suite for newspaper and magazine publishers. This module allows publications to create interactive, digital replicas of their print publications, expanding their reach ... Read more >Leading Beverage Manufacturer Selects Sysorex for Next Generation Data Center Upgrade July 11, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – July 11, 2016 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced purchase orders for approximately $2.5 million from a leading California-based beverage manufacturer and distributor to design and deploy a next generation data center architecture. Under the terms of the project, Sysorex will develop ... Read more >Mall Landlords Embrace High-Tech to Entice Shoppers June 7, 2016 Excerpt from: The Wall Street Journal
Esther Fung
June 7, 2016. Shopping malls are going high-tech.
Making technology investments to improve customer experiences has traditionally been the domain of retailers, which have introduced robots, touch-screen mirrors and virtual-reality goggles to attract shoppers to their stores in recent years.
…
“We’re bringing the same analytics Amazon used to crush bricks-and-mortar retailers into ... Read more >Sensing a radical shift in the way Canadians shop June 2, 2016 
Bob Koblovsky, of Sysorex, was promoting new technology to help retailers track movements and habits of shoppers during the Retail Council of Canada conference.
California tech company introduces its ‘passive’ sensors, which pick up on Wi-Fi, Bluetooth and cellular signals to help retailers track shoppers and shipments.
Francine Kopun, Business Reporter
Toronto Star, June 1, 2016
Imagine your trip ... Read more >Sysorex To Present At Upcoming Investor Conferences May 27, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, would be a featured presenter at the 5th Annual Marcum MicroCap Conference on Wednesday, June 1, 2016 at 2:30pm EST in the Morosco Room at the Grand Hyatt Hotel, New York City. The ... Read more >Sysorex Announces $4 million AirPatrol Installation May 25, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it has received an approximately $4 million purchase order for its AirPatrol unified Real Time Locationing System (uRTLS) in connection with the installation of an asset tracking and employee management platform for a new planned worker ... Read more >Sysorex to Debut AirPatrol for Retail Properties at Global Shopping Center Convention Next Week May 19, 2016 Unified real-time location platform uses Wi-Fi, cellular and Bluetooth devices to provide malls and shopping centers with unprecedented detail and insight into visitor behavior to drive business decisions
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it will debut AirPatrol for Retail Properties in Las Vegas ... Read more >Sysorex Global Reports Financial Results For The Quarter Ended March 31, 2016 May 12, 2016 Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
May 12, 2016 – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2016.
First Quarter 2016 Financial Highlights:
2016 Q1 revenue of $14.1 million
2016 Q1 gross margin of 28%
2016 Q1 GAAP net ... Read more >Sysorex To Announce First Quarter 2016 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Thursday, May 12, 2016 May 5, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will issue First Quarter 2016 financial results for the period ended March 31, 2016 and provide an update on corporate developments at 4:05pm eastern time on Thursday, May 12, 2016.
Management will host a conference call ... Read more >Sysorex’s LightMiner Connects with Tableau for High Speed Analytics and Visualizations March 31, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced the integration between its LightMiner Analytics platform and Tableau Software, a global leader in rapid-fire business analytics software. Users of the connected LightMiner-Tableau solution will have the ability to ingest, analyze and visualize large, complex datasets with ... Read more >Sysorex Launches LightMiner Analytics Platform March 30, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced the general availability of its advanced data analytics solution, LightMiner.  The solution, which consists of an in-memory hardware platform and specially tailored versions of the industry-standard SQL relational database and R statistical computing environment, is designed ... Read more >Sysorex Opens Live AirPatrol for Security Demonstration Center at Whiterock in the UK March 21, 2016 LONDON – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced the launch of a new AirPatrol for Security demonstration center just outside of London at the headquarters of corporate security and counter espionage firm, Whiterock. The creation of the demonstration center was a joint project between Whiterock and another Sysorex global security partner, Key Options, based in Sydney, ... Read more >Sysorex Awarded Army PMSS3 Contract Vehicle March 16, 2016 Company is one of 12 selected for the $461 million, 5-year contract
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions today announced that the Army’s Program Executive Office for Enterprise Information Systems (PEO EIS) has awarded one of its Program Management Support Services – 3 (PMSS3) contract vehicles ... Read more >Sysorex Global Reports Record Fourth Quarter and 2015 Financial Results March 10, 2016 Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
PALO ALTO, Calif. – (BUSINESS WIRE) –Sysorex Global (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions reported financial results today for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2015.
Fourth Quarter Financial Highlights:

2015 Q4 revenue of $20.3 million
2015 Q4 gross margin of ... Read more >Sysorex Global To Present at the 28th Annual ROTH Conference March 15, 2016 March 4, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif.–Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be presenting at the 28th Annual ROTH Conference on March 15, 2016 at 5:30pm (PDT) in The Promenade-White, at The Ritz Carlton Hotel in Dana Point, CA.
Mr. Ali will provide an overview of the company’s business model and growth strategy and will be ... Read more >Sysorex Global To Announce 2015 Fiscal Year End Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Thursday, March 10, 2016 March 3, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it will issue 2015 fiscal year end financial results for the period ended December 31, 2015 and provide an update on corporate developments at 4:05pm eastern time on March 10, 2016.
Management will host a conference call on Thursday, March 10, 2016, at 4:30pm Eastern Time ... Read more >Sysorex Announces AirPatrol for Healthcare March 1, 2016 Company’s patented locationing system unites diverse hospital asset, equipment and staff tracking technologies together in a single management platform
HIMSS 16 Conference, LAS VEGAS – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced the debut of AirPatrol for Healthcare, a unified Real Time Location System (uRTLS) that brings multiple asset, staff and equipment tracking technologies into a single, vendor-neutral ... Read more >Postmedia Selects Sysorex’s Shoom Digital Ad Management Platform for an Additional 151 Newspapers February 22, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced Postmedia Network Inc. (“Postmedia”) will extend its use of Sysorex’s Shoom digital newspaper advertising management solutions to an additional 151 publications. The newly added publications are the newspapers acquired by Postmedia in 2015 from Sun Media. With this expanded association, ... Read more >Sysorex to Speak on Securing the Internet of Things at National Data Privacy Day Event January 27, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) will speak on data privacy and Internet of Things (IoT) security during two sessions at the Securing the Internet of Things Forum on January 28, 2016 in Sacramento, California. Sysorex’s Infrastructure Security Practice Director, Umesh Jagannatha, will join eWeek Magazine’s Chris Preimesberger for ... Read more >Sysorex CTO to Speak at IoT Evolution Expo January 26, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that Sysorex Chief Technology Officer, Craig Harper, will lend his insights on the strengths and weaknesses of the various wireless technologies used in the “Internet of Things” (IoT) during the Enterprise IoT Session at the IoT Evolution Expo being held ... Read more >Sysorex announces IT Infrastructure Upgrade Engagement with Leading Beverage Distributor January 12, 2016 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has been engaged by one of the United States’ largest winemakers and beverage distributors to upgrade the company’s core IT infrastructure. The project, valued at approximately $440,000, is the latest in a series of engagements Sysorex has completed for ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Strategic Relationship with Tempered Networks December 21, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has entered into a strategic relationship with Seattle-based Tempered Networks, a developer of secure connectivity for business critical infrastructure and information. The relationship allows Sysorex to provide Tempered Networks’ security solutions as part of Sysorex’s Enterprise Managed Services, Big ... Read more >City of Seattle Selects Sysorex to Optimize its IT Infrastructure December 14, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced a $3.9 million purchase order from the City of Seattle to design and deploy an advanced information systems architecture that will help the city improve its IT infrastructure and streamline the management and safety of its critical data. In connection ... Read more >Sysorex announces latest in series of IT engagements with Fortune 500 biopharmaceutical firm November 30, 2015 $1.2 million engagement will have Sysorex provide critical IT infrastructure systems and services for BioPharma leader
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has once again been engaged by a Fortune 500 biopharmaceutical research and development firm to provide critical data infrastructure migration and upgrade services. The ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. to Present at the LD Micro Conference on December 2, 2015 November 25, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it will be a featured presenter at the 8th annual LD Micro Main Event Conference. Sysorex CEO, Nadir Ali, will present the company’s business model and growth strategy at 1:00pm PST on Dec 2, 2015, in Track 1 at ... Read more >Sysorex Lands New IT Systems Engagement With Leading Health Care Provider November 16, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced a new engagement with a California-based Fortune 500 health care services provider to deliver IT infrastructure and consulting services for the company’s IT modernization effort. The project’s scope includes designing, deploying and integrating advanced computer systems and software architecture that ... Read more >Shoom Ad Trends – October 2015: Spending Bounces Back November 12, 2015 After a slow summer, ad spending comes back strong in October
A summer that began with promise and quickly turned into a long, hot season with little to no ad growth came to a welcome end with a flurry of fresh advertising in October according to big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX). ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. Reports Results for the Third Quarter Ended September 30, 2015 November 4, 2015 Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
Palo Alto, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today reported financial results for the Third Quarter ended September 30, 2015.
“Our accomplishments in the third quarter demonstrate our trend toward driving growth in our professional services, proprietary data analytics and Sysorex ... Read more >Agriculture Giant Chooses Sysorex for IT Infrastructure Upgrade October 30, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that Driscoll’s, a leading grower of fresh fruits worldwide, has chosen Sysorex to upgrade its enterprise resource planning (ERP) systems with a high performance storage architecture to keep pace with the company’s growth.
“For global producers like Driscoll’s, ERP systems are ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. To Announce Third Quarter 2015 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Wednesday, November 4, 2015 October 27, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – (BUSINESS WIRE) – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it will host a conference call on Wednesday, November 4, 2015, at 4:30pm Eastern time to review financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2015, and provide an update on corporate developments. Following management’s ... Read more >Sysorex Secures $1 Million Sysorex CyberSecurity Engagement with US Government Agency October 27, 2015 Company’s AirPatrol ZoneDefense system to help secure sensitive government installations against mobile threats and data leakage
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has secured a $1 million engagement with a US Government agency for the company’s AirPatrol ZoneDefense mobile device detection and locationing system. ZoneDefense will ... Read more >Sysorex Secures New Systems Development Engagement With Gemini Observatory October 22, 2015 Company will develop and deploy new computer systems infrastructure for Hilo, Hawaii-based operator of twin giant telescopes
 Read more >Sysorex and AMP Technologies Announce Global Teaming Agreement October 14, 2015 Companies to integrate technologies, deliver asset management and analytics for retail and commercial real estate property managers
PALO ALTO, Calif. and MOUNTAIN VIEW, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), and AMP Technologies, a developer of real estate asset management systems, today announced that they have entered into a global business ... Read more >Sysorex Names Kevin Harris Chief Financial Officer October 13, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has named Kevin Harris as Chief Financial Officer. Harris is a veteran executive with more than two decades’ experience in senior financial roles. Harris, who will report to CEO Nadir Ali, is expected to join October 19, 2015.
“Kevin is ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Signing of $91 Million Contract October 6, 2015 Company signs multi-year deal to provide IT infrastructure solutions and services, data analytics and its AirPatrol products for new smart community
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) announced today that it has signed a $91 million contract to make its software and information systems the central nervous system for ... Read more >Sysorex to Provide High Performance Computers on Development of NASA Orion Spacecraft Project September 28, 2015 Sysorex Government Services Unit to provide high performance computing systems for use on NASA deep space crew transport craft
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that its Sysorex Government Services (SGS) unit has received a purchase order for an $893,000 sale to a leading global aerospace technology ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. Announces Pricing of Public Offering of Common Stock September 25, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif., September 25, 2015 – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced the pricing of an underwritten public offering of 5,250,000 shares of its common stock at a price to the public of $1.00 per share. The gross proceeds from this offering are expected to be approximately $5.25 million, ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. Announces Proposed Public Offering of Common Stock September 24, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif., September 24, 2015 – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex Global Holdings Corp (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it intends to offer shares of its common stock in an underwritten public offering. All shares offered are to be sold by Sysorex. Sysorex also expects to grant the underwriters a 30-day option ... Read more >Sysorex Adds Bluetooth Support to Its AirPatrol Mobile Device Security and Locationing Systems September 10, 2015 Company’s ZoneDefense and ZoneAware platforms can now detect and monitor Bluetooth devices as well as cellular and WiFi
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it has added the ability to detect and locate Bluetooth wireless devices as well as Cellular and WiFi support to its AirPatrol ZoneDefense and ... Read more >Sysorex CMO to Talk on the “Internet of Things” at CTIA Super Mobility Conference in Las Vegas September 3, 2015 Sage Osterfeld to discuss how millions of connected devices are creating new opportunities and transforming industries

PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that its chief marketing officer, Sage Osterfeld, will be joining a panel of industry leaders discussing how millions of “smart” Internet-connected devices are becoming major ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. Reports Record Revenues for the Second Quarter Ended June 30, 2015 August 5, 2015 Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time
// 







PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today reported financial results for the Second Quarter ended June 30, 2015.
Second Quarter Financial Highlights:

Q2 2015 Revenue of $17.7 Million
Q2 2015 Gross Margin of 32%
Q2 2015 GAAP net loss of $0.09 per ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. To Announce Second Quarter 2015 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Wednesday, August 5, 2015 July 30, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it will issue financial results for the Second Quarter ended June 30, 2015 at 4:05pm eastern time on August 5, 2015.
Management will host a conference call on Wednesday, August 5, 2015, at 4:30pm Eastern Time to review financial results ... Read more >Sysorex Signs Hearst Corporation to New 3-Year Deal July 29, 2015 Hearst’s newspaper division renews contract with Sysorex’s Shoom platform for ad tracking and competitive analysis data
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that Hearst Corporation has signed a three-year renewal for Sysorex’s Shoom eTearsheets, an advertising proof-of-publication and competitive analysis service for newspaper publishers. It is the ... Read more >Sysorex to Provide Retail Analytics for Saudi Shopping Center July 23, 2015 Company’s AirPatrol platform to provide half-million square foot upscale shopping and entertainment center with foot traffic, store performance and customer engagement analysis
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics and solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced its AirPatrol platform has been chosen to provide retail analytics for a 540,000 square foot upscale shopping, dining and ... Read more >Sysorex Lands New IT Infrastructure Deal With Leading Health Care Provider July 6, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced a new IT infrastructure development engagement with a Fortune 500 health care services provider based in California. Sysorex will develop and deploy a new advanced systems architecture that will provide high availability, security and compliance for proprietary health care ... Read more >Sysorex Announces $2.5 Million AirPatrol Contract July 1, 2015 Company’s AirPatrol platform to provide employee and asset tracking in communities for workers on 2022 World Cup infrastructure projects
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that its AirPatrol mobile device locationing and analytics system has been chosen as the worker locationing and asset management platform to ... Read more >Dell: Partners grow revenue, register more deals June 23, 2015 Dell’s channel VP reports expanding Dell partner revenue and deal registrations, noting some channel allies are more than doubling their Dell business.
Adding some channel partner color to Dell’s recent fiscal 2016 first quarter results, Cheryl Cook, vice president of global channels & alliances, talked up higher deal registration numbers, deeper penetration into accounts and an ... Read more >Lilien Systems, a Sysorex Company, Named to CRN Solution Provider 500 June 17, 2015 Annual list ranks North America’s Largest 500 Technology Integrators
Source: Lilien.com
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that its subsidiary company Lilien Systems, has once again been named to The Channel Company’s 2015 CRN® Solution Provider 500. The annual list, spanning eight categories, from hardware and software ... Read more >Citrix Partners with Sysorex to Deliver Strong Mobile Security June 16, 2015 If you weren’t able to make it to Citrix Synergy last month, or if you did attend but didn’t make it to the Enterprise Mobility Management Pavilion, you missed the opportunity to meet with the folks from Sysorex, a new Citrix XenMobile partner.

Sysorex’s flagship product, ZoneDefense, is a security platform for wireless and cellular networks ... Read more >Sysorex to Present at the LD Micro Invitational Conference May 29, 2015 CEO Nadir Ali will discuss company’s business model and growth strategy in Los Angeles on Monday, June 1, 2015
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be presenting at the ... Read more >Sysorex to Present at the 2015 Marcum Microcap Conference May 28, 2015 May 20, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be presenting at the 2015 Marcum Microcap Conference on Thursday, May 28, 2015 at 11:30 am eastern time at the Grand Hyatt ... Read more >Sysorex Named in TechTarget’s SearchVirtualDesktop.com “Best of Citrix Synergy” 2015 Award Winners May 18, 2015 Via TechTarget
May 15, 2015 NEWTON, Mass.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Technology media company TechTarget, Inc. (NASDAQ: TTGT) announced the winners of the Best of Citrix Synergy 2015 Awards at the Citrix Synergy ® 2015 conference held this week in Orlando and sponsored by Citrix, Inc.

TechTarget’s SearchVirtualDesktop.com™ and BrianMadden.com staff appointed a team of experts and editors that selected winning ... Read more >Leading Health Care Provider Chooses Sysorex for $1.9 Million Critical Data Infrastructure Project May 18, 2015 Sysorex will design and deploy distributed systems architecture to ensure safety and security of business critical information
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has been chosen by a Fortune 500 California-based health care services provider to design, develop and deploy an advanced information systems architecture ... Read more >Sysorex to Develop Gaming Analytics for CrowdStar May 13, 2015 Big Data analytics provider to create real time in-game analysis system for Bay Area based mobile gaming company
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has entered into an agreement with Burlingame, California-based mobile game developer CrowdStar Inc. to build a real-time analytics solution that will ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Financial Results for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2015 May 7, 2015 Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time







PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global leader in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2015.
First Quarter Financial Highlights:

Q1 2015 Revenue of $14.1 Million
Q1 2015 Gross Margin of 29%
Q1 2015 GAAP net loss ... Read more >Bridge Bank Increases Sysorex Credit Line and Extends an Additional Term Loan for up to $12 Million in Financing May 7, 2015 Source: Bridge Capital Holdings
SAN JOSE, CA — (Marketwired) — 05/07/15 — Bridge Capital Holdings (NASDAQ: BBNK), whose subsidiary is Bridge Bank, a full-service professional business bank headquartered in Silicon Valley and with offices located nationwide, announced today that its Capital Finance Banking team has amended its revolving credit facility with Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a leading ... Read more >Sysorex Acquires Assets of LightMiner Systems April 30, 2015 In Memory Database Software Platform Acquisition Strengthens Sysorex’s Big Data Analytics Product Offerings
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has completed the acquisition of substantially all the assets of LightMiner Systems, including all intellectual property related to its high-speed database management system. Sysorex purchased the ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. to Announce First Quarter 2015 Financial Results and Provide a Company Update on May 7, 2015 April 30, 2015 Palo Alto, Calif. –Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that it will release its financial results for the First Quarter ended March 31, 2015, at 4:05 pm Eastern Time on Thursday, May 7, 2015.
Management will host a ... Read more >Sysorex Hires Sean Thompson as VP Sales, Professional Services – Eastern U.S. April 28, 2015 Veteran IT sales pro to expand and grow East Coast territory
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that Sean Thompson has joined the company as Vice President of Sales – Eastern Region for the Professional Services unit. Thompson brings over 20 years of sales operations experience ... Read more >Sysorex Awarded CIO-CS Contract April 23, 2015 Big data and IT infrastructure firm’s Lilien division among those selected as a NITAAC Prime Contract Holder
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that its Lilien Systems division has been selected as one of the 65 Prime Contract Holders under the Chief Information Officer – Commodities ... Read more >Sysorex to Present at the 16th Annual B. Riley & Co. Investor Conference on May 12, 2015 April 16, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be presenting at the 16th Annual B. Riley & Co. Investor Conference on Tuesday, May 12, 2015 at 10:30 am Pacific time ... Read more >Lilien Systems, a Sysorex Company, Named to 2015 List of CRN Tech Elite April 13, 2015 Annual list recognizes IT solution providers with deep technical expertise and premier certifications
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that its Lilien Systems subsidiary, has once again been named to The Channel Company’s CRN® Tech Elite 250. This annual list recognizes an elite group of IT ... Read more >Sysorex Awarded NASA SEWP V Contract April 7, 2015 Big data and IT infrastructure firm one of a select group of winners to receive contracts in the fifth iteration of the NASA contract vehicle
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software and infrastructure solutions provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it been awarded a contract in the National Aeronautics and Space Administration’s (NASA) fifth Solutions ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Strategic Partnership with Cloudian March 25, 2015 Sysorex to offer Cloudian storage appliances and software as part of the Sysorex enterprise managed services and cloud platforms
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that it has entered into a partnership with Cloudian, Inc. that will allow Sysorex to offer Cloudian’s HyperStore cloud storage software ... Read more >Sysorex Awarded Sub-Contract on $249 Million Army Enterprise IT Services Contract March 18, 2015 Company will support Octo Consulting Group on U.S. Army Enterprise Information Technology Services contract
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data software solutions and infrastructure provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it has been awarded a subcontract to support Octo Consulting Group, Inc. (Octo) on the $249 million Enterprise Information Technology Services (EITS) Indefinite Delivery / Indefinite ... Read more >Sysorex joins the TELUS IoT Marketplace March 16, 2015 Canadian telecommunications provider adds AirPatrol’s location-based mobile solutions to its Internet of Things online market
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX) subsidiary AirPatrol Corporation, which develops mobile device detection and locationing systems, today announced it has signed TELUS (TSX: T, NYSE: TU), Canada’s fastest-growing national telecommunications company, to resell AirPatrol products via the TELUS Internet of ... Read more >Sysorex Reports Fourth Quarter and 2014 Financial Results March 5, 2015 Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time






March 05, 2015 04:18 PM Eastern Standard Time

PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global leader in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions, today reported financial results for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2014.
2014 Fourth Quarter Financial Highlights:

2014 revenue of $15 million
2014 gross ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. to Announce 2014 Fiscal Year End Financial Results and Provide a Company Update on March 5, 2015 March 2, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global leader in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions, announced today that it will issue 2014 fiscal year end financial results for the period ended December 31, 2014 and provide an update on corporate developments following the market close on March 5, 2015.








Management will host a conference call on ... Read more >SYSOREX to Present at the 27th Annual ROTH Conference on March 10, 2015 February 26, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global leader in big data analytics and location-based solutions, announced today that Nadir Ali, CEO, will present at the 27th Annual ROTH Conference on March 10, 2015 at 4:30pm Pacific time at The Ritz Carlton Hotel Laguna Niguel in Dana Point, CA. Mr. Ali will also be available for one-on-one ... Read more >Sysorex and Pay Tel Announce Partnership to End Contraband Cell Phone Use in Correctional Facilities February 9, 2015 Partnership will provide precision detection and locationing of cell phones for correctional facilities; improving safety and bolstering revenue.
ACA 2015 LONG BEACH, Calif. – Addressing the growing problem of illicit cell phone use in correctional facilities, Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) division AirPatrol, a developer of mobile device detection systems, and Pay Tel Communications, a provider of inmate ... Read more >Sysorex Named One of the Largest Big Data Firms in Seattle Area; Announces $1.3 Million in New Pacific Northwest Projects February 2, 2015 Big data analytics provider lands projects in higher education and aerospace, named one of 2014’s top five big data software companies in the Puget Sound
PALO ALTO, Calif. – Big data analytics provider Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced it was awarded three new projects in the state of Washington with an aggregate value of approximately $1.3 ... Read more >Sysorex Announces Management Change January 30, 2015 PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX) (the “Company”), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced a management change.







The Company has appointed Wendy Loundermon as its interim Chief Financial Officer. Ms. Loundermon replaces Will Frederick, who has resigned to pursue other interests, and management ... Read more >Pausing Before Tapping “Connect:” Can Privacy and Security Coexist During the Internet of Things Era? January 27, 2015 Airpatrol CEO Cleve Adams to lead discussion at Data Privacy Day 2015















SAN DIEGO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–As the number of devices connected to the Internet continues to grow exponentially, concerns about security and privacy are growing, too. As part of an international effort to raise awareness and education on the new challenges in protecting privacy and controlling one’s ... Read more >Sysorex Chairman Recognized for His Early Work in Data Analytics with the Dallas Cowboys January 2, 2015 Decades Before Moneyball, The Dallas Cowboys Used Advanced Stats To Win Super Bowls 
By FiveThirtyEight
A. Salam Qureishi grew up in India and knew nothing about football — or America. And yet in the early 1960s, Qureishi, a computer programmer and statistician, helped the Dallas Cowboys overhaul their scouting system, replacing hunches with hard numbers.
The result: five ... Read more >AirPatrol Technology Counts More Than 70,000 Visitors to San Diego County’s Carlsbad Village Fair December 19, 2014 Event attendance at one of America’s largest one-day street fairs was measured by counting cellphones







CARLSBAD, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–More than 70,000 visitors attended the Carlsbad Village Fair on November 2nd according to numbers gathered by AirPatrol Corporation, a Sysorex Company (NASDAQ: SYRX). The figures, which AirPatrol compiled using technology that counts people based on the “pings” their ... Read more >Sysorex Scores a Hat Trick with Its Big Data Analytics December 11, 2014 Company’s new next generation analytics solutions win customers in biopharmaceuticals, fraud prevention and online gaming







PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced the signing of a trio of customers for the company’s enterprise big data analytics solutions. The customers — a billion dollar biopharmaceutical firm, a leading online fraud prevention company, and one of the ... Read more >Sysorex to Present at the LD Micro Conference on December 2, 2014 November 25, 2014 PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Nadir Ali, ‘Sysorexs CEO, will present at the LD Micro Main Event VII Conference at the Luxe Sunset, Los Angeles, CA on Tuesday, December 2, 2014 at 3:00pm PDT, ... Read more >SYSOREX To Present At The Inaugural Equities.Com Small-Cap Stars Conference At The NASDAQ Marketsite On December 18, 2014 November 21, 2014 Palo Alto, CA, Nov. 20, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) — Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors today announced that it will be presenting at the inaugural equities.com Small-Cap Stars Conference at the world-famous NASDAQ MarketSite on December 18, 2014. The event is ... Read more >Sysorex Reports Third Quarter 2014 Financial Results November 13, 2014 

Conference Call to be Held Today at 4:30 pm Eastern Time




PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a global technology leader specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2014.
Third Quarter 2014 Financial Highlights:

Third quarter revenue of $14.3 million
Third quarter ... Read more >AirPatrol, a Sysorex Company, and Cubeware GmbH Announce Strategic Alliance for Mobile Analytics November 6, 2014 

Mobile device services and security developer joins with business intelligence provider to develop precision mobile device and location analytics system




PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–In a strategic alliance, Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX) subsidiary AirPatrol Corporation, a developer of mobile device detection and locationing systems, and Cubeware GmbH, a leading provider of business intelligence and analytics software in Europe, today ... Read more >AirPatrol CEO, Cleve Adams Joins Advisory Board of NICE Cyber Education Map November 5, 2014 

Location-based services and mobility expert brings knowledge and perspective to new cybersecurity and STEM initiatives




COLUMBIA, Md.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Cleve Adams, CEO of AirPatrol Corporation, a Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX) subsidiary, and a developer of mobile device detection and locationing systems, has joined the National Initiative for Cybersecurity Education (NICE) Cybersecurity Map’s advisory board. The NICE Cybersecurity Map is an interactive ... Read more >Sysorex to Announce Third Quarter 2014 Financial Results and Provide a Company Update on Thursday, November 13, 2014 October 29, 2014 
PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Sysorex”), a global technology provider specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that it will issue financial results and corporate developments for the Third Quarter ended September 30, 2014 following the market close on November 13, 2014.
Management will ... Read more >Lilien Systems Announces New Reseller Partner Agreements with Seagate and Basho for Object Storage Solutions October 27, 2014 Recent reseller agreements extend relationship and services for delivering reliable solutions for on-premises or private cloud enterprise customers

SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Lilien Systems, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), today announced new strategic reseller partner agreements with Seagate Technology’s Cloud Systems and Solutions and Basho Technologies to address the emerging and growing market of ... Read more >Lilien Systems Named to CIO Review’s 100 Most Promising Oracle Solution Providers for 2014 October 8, 2014 Annual list recognizing IT vendors at the forefront of Oracle Solutions


SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Lilien Systems, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), announced it has been named to CIO Review’s 100 Most Promising Oracle Solution Providers for 2014. According to CIO Review, these companies are in the forefront of tackling Big Data challenges and ... Read more >Sysorex Expands Executive Team to Support Continued Growth October 2, 2014 

Sysorex Announces CFO Veteran Will Frederick joins Company and Wendy Loundermon becomes VP of Finance




PALO ALTO, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Sysorex”), a global technology provider specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Will Frederick has joined the company as Chief Financial Officer effective ... Read more >AirPatrol Corporation Receives Two Patents for Mobile Location and Security September 30, 2014 New patents bolster company’s leadership in app-free precision device locationing and mobile security

MAPLE LAWN, Md.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–AirPatrol Corporation (“AirPatrol”), a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), today announced that the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office has issued two new patents to AirPatrol for its technology developments in the areas of mobile device detection, locationing ... Read more >Lilien Systems Joins FireEye Fuel Partner Program September 17, 2014 

New partnership brings together Lilien IT security expertise and FireEye advanced threat protection to safeguard organizations from modern threats




SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Lilien Systems, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), today announced that they have partnered with FireEye, Inc. (NASDAQ: FEYE), a leader at stopping today’s advanced cyber attacks through its FireEye Fuel Partner ... Read more >Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. to Present at 5th Annual Craig-Hallum Alpha Select Conference September 16, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Sysorex Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Sysorex”), a global technology provider specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be a featured presenter at the 5th annual Craig-Hallum Alpha Select Conference to be held on Thursday, September 18, 2014 in ... Read more >Inpixon Demonstrates Automatic Mobile Policy Changes at AirWatch Connect Atlanta 2014 September 9, 2014 

AirWatch Enterprise Mobility Management platform and Inpixon’s ZoneDefense provides dynamic solution for customers and partners




ATLANTA–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), announces its live demonstration of Inpixon’s ZoneDefense for AirWatch® by VMware at AirWatch Connect™ Atlanta 2014 booth 408, taking place Sept. 8-11.
ZoneDefense allows organizations using AirWatch Enterprise Mobility Management ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. to Present at Upcoming Investor Conferences September 4, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), a global technology provider specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be a featured presenter at the Rodman & Renshaw 16th Annual Global Investment Conference on September 10, 2014 at the ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. to Ring the Nasdaq Stock Market Closing Bell August 25, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), a global technology provider specializing in big data analytics and location-based mobile solutions for the private and public sectors, will celebrate its listing on the NASDAQ with a visit by its executive team to the NASDAQ MarketSite in Times Square. In honor of the occasion, Inpixon ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. Announces Results for the Quarter Ended June 30, 2014 August 14, 2014 

Conference Call to be Held Today at 5:00 pm Eastern Time




SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an emerging growth technology company, today reported its financial results for the three months ended June 30, 2014.
Second Quarter 2014 Financial Highlights

Second quarter 2014 revenue of $17.1 million
Second quarter 2014 consolidated gross profit margins of 33.1%
Second ... Read more >Inpixon Announces Support for AirWatch Enterprise Mobility Management Platform August 13, 2014 ZoneDefense 5 for AirWatch allows automatic changes to mobile device security policies based on location and owner.

MAPLE LAWN, Md.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ: SYRX), today announced a new add-in for its ZoneDefense® 5 mobile device security platform that will allow organizations using the Enterprise Mobility Management suite from ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. Second Quarter 2014 Financial Results and Company Update Conference Call on Thursday, August 14, 2014 August 11, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an information technology solutions and services company, today announced that it will host a conference call on Thursday, August 14, 2014, at 5:00 pm Eastern Time to review its financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2014 and other corporate developments. Following management’s formal ... Read more >Cybersecurity Needs Expanding Beyond Computers or Your Pocket and Into Your Home August 4, 2014 

Mobile device security expert to lead forum on the risks of Internet-connected things during annual Black Hat Conference in Las Vegas




LAS VEGAS–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Cleve Adams wants you to know that while you were busy updating your WiFi router’s firewall and giving your laptop a strong password, your vacuum cleaner and smart lighting system were conspiring with ... Read more >Inpixon Companies Open Joint Offices and Technology Demonstration Center in Southern California July 29, 2014 
Inpixon Corporation and Lilien Systems open new West Coast operations in Carlsbad, California
MAPLE LAWN, Maryland & SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Two Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”) subsidiaries today announced the opening of joint offices in Carlsbad, California, about 30 miles north of San Diego. Inpixon Corporation (“Inpixon”), which develops a suite of location-based security and services ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. Appoints New Directors July 14, 2014 SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), (“Inpixon”) an information technology solutions and services company, today announced the appointment of Thomas L. Steding, Tanveer A. Khader and Kareem M. Irfan to its Board of Directors. The Company’s Board of Directors is now comprised of seven directors, four of whom are independent in compliance with ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. Names Craig Harper CTO June 25, 2014 
SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), (“Inpixon”), an information technology solutions and services company, announced today that Craig Harper has joined the company as Chief Technology Officer to lead the development of custom technology solutions for the company’s worldwide government and commercial clients. Mr. Harper’s experience includes 15 years of executive management within the ... Read more >Lilien Systems Named to CRN’s 2014 Solution Provider 500 List June 9, 2014 

Annual list recognizes top revenue-generating technology integrators in US and Canada




SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Lilien Systems, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), today announced it has been named to the 2014 Solution Provider 500 (SP500) list by The Channel Company’s CRN. The list ranks what CRN editors believe are the top revenue-generating technology integrators ... Read more >Inpixon Corporation Delivers Location-Based Mobile Device Security for Good Technology Customers June 3, 2014 

ZoneDefense for Good will allow organizations to dynamically change mobile device security policies based on device owner and location




MAPLE LAWN, Md.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Location-based mobile device security developer Inpixon Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), today announced it has joined Good Technology™’s partner ecosystem to provide organizations with the ability to automatically change ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. to Present at the LD MICRO Invitational Conference on June 4, 2014 May 28, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an information technology solutions and services company, announced today that Nadir Ali, CEO will present at the LD MICRO Invitational Conference. The presentation will take place at the Luxe Hotel Sunset Boulevard in Los Angeles on Wednesday, June 4th, 2014 at 10:00am PDT. For further information ... Read more >Inpixon Corp Lands Top Honors in 2014 Tech Awards May 27, 2014 MAPLE LAWN, Md.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Corporation, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), today announced it has been named “Superstar Company of the Year” by the Howard Tech Council (HTC), a Washington, D.C.-area organization that works in conjunction with the State of Maryland’s Center for Entrepreneurship and the Howard County Economic Development Authority to ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. to Present at the Third Annual Marcum MicroCap Conference on May 29, 2014 May 22, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an information technology solutions and services company, today announced that it will be a featured presenter at the 3rd Annual Marcum MicroCap Conference on Thursday, May 29, 2014 in New York City at the Grand Hyatt Hotel.
The Company’s presentation is scheduled to begin at 1:30 p.m. ... Read more >Lilien Systems Named to CIO Review’s 100 Most Promising Big Data Companies for 2014 May 19, 2014 Annual list recognizes IT vendors at the forefront of Big Data Solutions
SAN FRANCISCO–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Lilien Systems, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX), announced that it has been named to CIO Review’s 100 Most Promising Big Data Companies for 2014. According to CIO Review, these companies are in the forefront of tackling Big Data ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. Announces Results for the Quarter Ended March 31, 2014 May 15, 2014 Conference Call to be Held May 15, 2014 at 4:45 pm Eastern Time

SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an emerging growth technology company, today reported its financial results for the three-months ended March 31, 2014.
Revenues were $16,320,000 for the three-month period ended March 31, 2014 as compared to $5,362,000 in revenues for ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. First Quarter 2014 Financial Results and Company Update Conference Call on May 15, 2014 May 13, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an information technology solutions and services company, will host a conference call on May 15, 2014, at 4:45 pm Eastern Time to discuss the release of the company’s financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2014. Following management’s prepared remarks, there will be a ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. Completes Acquisition of Inpixon Corporation April 21, 2014 
SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon”), an emerging growth technology company, today announced that it has completed the acquisition of Inpixon Corporation (“Inpixon”), a developer of location-based cybersecurity and commercial services systems for mobile devices, for $30 million consisting of $10 million of common stock, $10 million in cash (before working capital ... Read more >Inpixon Announces Pricing of Initial Public Offering for 3,333,333 Shares of Common Stock April 9, 2014 April 09, 2014

SANTA CLARA, Calif.–(BUSINESS WIRE)–Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (NASDAQ:SYRX) (“Inpixon” or the “Company”), a technology solutions and services company, today announced that it has priced its initial public offering of 3,333,333 shares of common stock at an offering price of $6.00 per share, including 166,667 shares of common stock sold by a selling stockholder, ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings and Geneseo Communications Announce Strategic Relationship February 27, 2014 Inpixon Global Holdings to Partner with Geneseo Communications to Launch Cloud Analytics Services with Geneseo’s subsidiary, ColoHub; Geneseo Completes $2M Strategic Investment in Inpixon 
SANTA CLARA, CA–(Marketwired – Feb 27, 2014) – Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX) (“Inpixon”), a developer of leading information technology solutions, today announced that it has entered into a strategic relationship ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Signs Definitive Agreement to Acquire Inpixon Corporation January 6, 2014 Acquisition is expected to give Inpixon foothold in high growth mobile device security and location-based services markets
SANTA CLARA, CA – (Accesswire – January 6, 2014) – Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (OTC:  SYRX) (“Inpixon”), a developer of leading information technology solutions today announced that it has signed a definitive Agreement and Plan of Merger (“Merger Agreement”) ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Acquires Shoom Inc., A Leading Provider Of Cloud Based Data Analytics & Enterprise Solutions September 4, 2013 SANTA CLARA, Calif., September 03, 2013 – Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX.PK US), a leading information technology solutions and services company, today announced it has acquired Los Angeles, CA- based Shoom Inc., a leading provider of cloud based data analytics and enterprise solutions to the Media, Publishing and Entertainment industries for 2,762,000 Inpixon Common Shares ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Partners with Leading Global Provider of Process-Driven IT Solutions, Softtek in the U.S. Market. August 19, 2013 Agreement seeks to expand and strengthen business in the public and private sectors.
SANTA CLARA, Calif., August 19, 2013 – Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX.PK US), a leading information technology solutions and services company, today announced that it has formed an alliance with Softtek, a global provider of process-driven IT solutions, to deliver a broader range ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp., Announces Results for the Quarter Ended June 30, 2013 and Provides Update. August 19, 2013 SANTA CLARA, Calif., August 19, 2013 — Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX.PK US), a leading information technology solutions and services company, today announced Net Revenues of $14.8 million for the Quarter ended June 30, 2013, an increase of approximately $13.8 million compared to the same period in 2012 and a Net Loss of approximately $436,000, ... Read more >Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. To Present At The Marcum LLP MicroCap Conference May 20, 2013 
SANTA CLARA, Calif., May 20, 2013 /PRNewswire/ — Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX.PK US),  a leading information technology solutions and services company, today announced that the Company will present at the Second Annual Marcum LLP MicroCap Conference on Thursday, May 30, 2013 in New York City at the Grand Hyatt Hotel.
The Company’s presentation is scheduled ... Read more >Inpixon Completes Acquisition Of Lilien March 21, 2013 
SANTA CLARA, Calif., March 21, 2013 /PRNewswire/ — Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX.PK US), a leading information technology solutions and services company, today announced the acquisition of Lilien LLC, an enterprise IT infrastructure solution provider with over $40 million in annual revenue, through a combination of stock and cash from debt financing.  Acquiring Lilien expands Inpixon’s ... Read more >Inpixon Awarded Prime Position On $250 Million Pillar Contract To Provide SPAWAR Systems Center Atlantic Business And Force Support February 28, 2013 
HERNDON, Va., Feb. 28, 2013 /PRNewswire/ — Inpixon Government Services, Inc. (Inpixon), a leading information technology solutions and services company and wholly owned subsidiary of Inpixon Global Holdings Corp. (SYRX.PK), announced today that they have received a multi-million dollar contract as a small business Prime Contractor on the Space and Naval Warfare Systems Center (SSC) ... Read more >







CompanyManagement
Board of Directors
Investors
In the News

Subscribe to News


Careers
Contact Us

Request a Demo
Request More Info




 
 

 
 
 
 





































































































































 










Sysorex Global - NASDAQ:SYRX - Stock Quote & News - TheStreet




























 





















Action Alerts PLUS

Access AAPJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 2017Charitable Trust PortfolioMost Recent Trade Alert25 Investing Rules10 Trading Commandments

Real Money

Access RM25 Rules of InvestingJim Cramer's Best Stocks for 201710 CommandmentsStressed Out StocksCramer's Blog

Cramer
Mad Money
ETFs
Futures
Markets
Much More

BanksBiotechRetailTechPersonal FinanceRetirementFinancial Advisor CenterHow to SpendOptionsFixed IncomeVideo










Privacy Policy|Terms of Use© 1996- TheStreet Inc. All rights reserved
















                                DJIA
                            







                                NASDAQ
                            







                                S&P 500
                            






Market Data updated






Sign In




Your Membership(s)








Your Account





Account Preferences


Alerts


Newsletters







Subscribe





Logout



Subscribe

Access insights and guidance from our Wall Street pros. Find the product that's right for you.
Action Alerts PLUS
Daily Swing Trade
Income Seeker
Quant Ratings
Real Money
Real Money Pro
Stocks Under $10
Top Stocks
Trifecta Stocks
Real Money Pro Portfolio
Chairman's Club
Compare All 
Chatter on the Street










































 

















Sysorex Global (SYRX)
Follow




                                    0.53
                                

0.04
6.81




                        NASDAQ 
                    

Aug 3, 2017 12:13 PM EDT












Prev Close
  0.57


Open
0.56


Day Low/High

                                    0.50 /
                                    0.57


52 Wk Low/High

                                    0.55 /
                                    11.08
                                


Volume
156.79K











Exchange
NASDAQ


Shares Outstanding
32.24B


Market Cap
7.25M


Div & Yield

                                        
                                            N.A. (N.A)
                                        
                                    























Trade with Jim Cramer 14 Days FREE 









Latest News




Sysorex Rebrands To Inpixon, Signifying Increased Focus On Indoor Positioning Analytics






Sysorex Announces Favorable Decision From The Nasdaq Hearings Panel













Sysorex Named To 2017 CRN MSP Elite 150 List
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that CRN®, a brand of The Channel Company, has named Sysorex to its 2017 Managed Service Provider (MSP) 500 list in the Elite...

Feb 23, 2017 9:00 AM EST













Sysorex Appoints Soumya Das As Chief Marketing Officer
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced that Soumya Das has joined the company as Chief Marketing Officer.

Jan 17, 2017 9:00 AM EST













Sysorex Launches 3-Part "Freethinkers Of The Retail World" Webinar Series
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), the indoor positioning and data analytics company, today announced the launch of its 3-part webinar series titled "Freethinkers of the Retail World.

Dec 19, 2016 9:00 AM EST













Sysorex Announces Pricing Of $2.0 Million Registered Direct Offering
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) (the "Company"), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it has entered into definitive agreements with institutional investors for an offering of shares...

Dec 12, 2016 9:48 AM EST













Sysorex To Present At The 9th Annual LD Micro Conference On December 6, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will be a featured presenter at the 9 th annual LD Micro Main Event Conference.

Dec 5, 2016 6:02 AM EST













Sysorex Announces The Closing Of Integrio Acquisition
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, is pleased to announce that it has completed the acquisition of certain assets of Integrio Technologies, an IT integration and...

Nov 29, 2016 9:00 AM EST













Sysorex To Present At The 9th Annual LD Micro Conference On December 6, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will be a featured presenter at the 9 th annual LD Micro Main Event Conference.

Nov 29, 2016 8:30 AM EST













Sysorex Reports Financial Results For The Third Quarter Ended September 30, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported financial results for the third quarter ended September 30, 2016.

Nov 14, 2016 4:05 PM EST













Sysorex Announces Intent To Purchase Certain Assets Of Integrio Technologies, LLC
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it has signed a definitive Asset Purchase Agreement to acquire certain assets of Integrio Technologies Inc.

Nov 14, 2016 4:04 PM EST













Sysorex To Announce Third Quarter 2016 Financial Results And Provide Company Update On Monday, November 14, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will issue Third Quarter 2016 financial results for the period ended September 30, 2016 and provide an update...

Nov 7, 2016 7:45 PM EST













Sysorex To Present At The Aegis Capital Growth Conference On Wednesday, September 21, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it will be a featured presenter at the Aegis Capital Growth Conference, being held September 20-22, 2016 at the Encore...

Sep 16, 2016 8:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Announces AirPatrol Contract With Top Mall Operator
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it has secured an AirPatrol for Retail Properties managed services contract with a top mall operator.

Sep 8, 2016 8:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Reports Financial Results For The Second Quarter Ended June 30, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported financial results for the second quarter ended June 30, 2016.

Aug 11, 2016 4:05 PM EDT













Sysorex Completes $5M Private Placement
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported that it closed a private placement for aggregate gross proceeds of $5 million pursuant to which it issued $5.

Aug 10, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex To Announce Second Quarter 2016 Financial Results And Provide Company Update On Thursday, August 11, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will issue Second Quarter 2016 financial results for the period ended June 30, 2016 and provide an update on...

Aug 4, 2016 8:30 AM EDT













Sysorex Launches Shoom EPublication Platform
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced the release of ePublication, the latest component in its Shoom eSolutions suite for newspaper and magazine publishers.

Jul 13, 2016 1:00 PM EDT













Leading Beverage Manufacturer Selects Sysorex For Next Generation Data Center Upgrade
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced purchase orders for approximately $2.

Jul 11, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex To Present At Upcoming Investor Conferences
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, would be a featured presenter at the 5th Annual Marcum MicroCap Conference on Wednesday, June 1,...

May 27, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Announces $4 Million AirPatrol Installation
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it has received an approximately $4 million purchase order for its AirPatrol unified Real Time Locationing System...

May 25, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex To Debut AirPatrol For Retail Properties At Global Shopping Center Convention Next Week
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced it will debut AirPatrol for Retail Properties in Las Vegas next week in conjunction with RECon 2016, the global...

May 19, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Global Reports Financial Results For The Quarter Ended March 31, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today reported financial results for the first quarter ended March 31, 2016.

May 12, 2016 4:05 PM EDT













Sysorex To Announce First Quarter 2016 Financial Results And Provide Company Update On Thursday, May 12, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced that it will issue First Quarter 2016 financial results for the period ended March 31, 2016 and provide an update on...

May 5, 2016 2:30 PM EDT













Sysorex LightMiner Connects With Tableau For High Speed Analytics And Visualizations
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced the integration between its LightMiner Analytics platform and Tableau Software, a global leader in rapid-fire business...

Mar 31, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Launches LightMiner Analytics Platform
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions, today announced the general availability of its advanced data analytics solution, LightMiner.

Mar 30, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Awarded Army PMSS3 Contract Vehicle
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions today announced that the Army's Program Executive Office for Enterprise Information Systems (PEO EIS) has awarded one of its Program...

Mar 16, 2016 9:00 AM EDT













Sysorex Global Reports Record Fourth Quarter And 2015 Financial Results
Sysorex Global (NASDAQ: SYRX), a developer of high performance analytics software and solutions reported financial results today for the fourth quarter and year ended December 31, 2015.

Mar 10, 2016 4:05 PM EST













Sysorex Global To Present At The 28th Annual ROTH Conference March 15, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ: SYRX) today announced that announced that Nadir Ali, CEO, will be presenting at the 28th Annual ROTH Conference on March 15, 2016 at 5:30pm (PDT) in The Promenade-White, at The Ritz Carlton Hotel in Dana...

Mar 4, 2016 12:30 PM EST













Sysorex Global To Announce 2015 Fiscal Year End Financial Results And Provide Company Update On Thursday, March 10, 2016
Sysorex (NASDAQ:SYRX) today announced that it will issue 2015 fiscal year end financial results for the period ended December 31, 2015 and provide an update on corporate developments at 4:05pm Eastern time on March 10, 2016.

Mar 3, 2016 9:00 AM EST












Next






Load More








From Our Partners



Sysorex Global misses by $0.02, misses on revenue

SeekingAlpha



Sysorex Global reports Q3 results

SeekingAlpha



Sysorex Global misses by $0.03, misses on revenue

SeekingAlpha



Sysorex Global initiated with a Buy at B. Riley

The Fly



Sysorex Global strength a selling opportunity, says Dougherty

The Fly
























 








Trending


Elon Musk Reveals Tons of People Have Canceled Tesla Model 3 Orders, Proving Several Key Things


It Has Gotten So Sad for Costco and Sam's Club They Are Discounting Stuff on Groupon


Tim Cook on Trump's Claim that Apple Is Building 3 U.S. Factories: 'There's More We Can Do'


Apple Has Discovered a Secret Pool of People That Really Want to Use iPads


Tesla's Remarkable Rally Just Getting Started: Chart











Advertising Partners
 
 
 
 













 












 


































 


©1996-2017 TheStreet, Inc. All rights reserved.Action Alerts PLUS is a registered trademark of TheStreet, Inc.




Compare Brokers
 
 
 
 
 
 











Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX) Stock Price, News & Analysis






















    























































































Sysorex Global Company Profile (NASDAQ:INPX)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)
Inpixon, formerly Sysorex Global, provides data analytics and location-based solutions and services to commercial and government customers across the world. The Company operates through four segments: Mobile, IoT & Big Data Products, which includes its AirPatrol product line and on-premise big data appliance product; Storage and Computing, which includes third-party hardware, software and related maintenance/warranty products and services that the Company resells; SaaS Revenues, which provides software-as-a-services or Internet-based hosted services, and Professional Services, which offers general information technology (IT) services. Its products and services include LightMiner Analytics Platform, Data Science and Advanced Analytics Consulting Services, AirPatrol for Security, AirPatrol for Retail, Shoom Product Line, Enterprise Infrastructure Solutions and Services, and IT Services. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Business Services
Industry: IT Services & Consulting - NEC
Sub-Industry: N/A
Symbol: NASDAQ:INPX
CUSIP: N/A
Web: www.inpixon.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $1.44 millionOutstanding Shares: 2,441,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $0.95200 Day Moving Avg: $2.4752 Week Range: $0.55 - $11.08


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: N/AForeward P/E Ratio: InfinityP/E Growth: -0.010000Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $52.56 millionPrice / Sales: 0.03Book Value: ($0.84) per sharePrice / Book: -0.68


Profitability:EBIDTA: ($11,630,000.00)Net Margins: -54.93%Return on Equity: -378.28%Return on Assets: -41.49%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: -1.14%Current Ratio: 0.45%Quick Ratio: 0.43%Misc:Average Volume: 702,966 shs.Beta: 1.41Short Ratio: 1.54

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)
What is Sysorex Global's stock symbol?

Sysorex Global trades on the NASDAQ under the ticker symbol "INPX."



How were Sysorex Global's earnings last quarter?

Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX) announced its quarterly earnings results on Thursday, August, 11th. The company reported ($0.11) earnings per share for the quarter, missing analysts' consensus estimates of ($0.08) by $0.03. The firm earned $13.30 million during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $16.90 million. Sysorex Global had a negative net margin of 54.93% and a negative return on equity of 378.28%.  View Sysorex Global's Earnings History.



When will Sysorex Global make its next earnings announcement?

Sysorex Global is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Thursday, August, 10th 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Sysorex Global.



Where is Sysorex Global's stock going? Where will Sysorex Global's stock price be in 2017?

1 brokerages have issued 12 month price objectives for Sysorex Global's shares. Their forecasts range from $3.25 to $3.25. On average, they anticipate Sysorex Global's stock price to reach $3.25 in the next year. View Analyst Ratings for Sysorex Global.



Who are some of Sysorex Global's key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Sysorex Global include Imaginatik Plc (IMTK), Accumuli Ltd (ACM), Apigee Corp (APIC), Arcontech Group PLC (ARC), Cloudbuy PLC (ATUK), Covisint Corporation (COVS), Cyan (CYNI), Datalink (DTLK), DDD Group Plc (DDD), Digital Globe Services Ltd (DGS), DXC Technology Co (CSC), EPIQ Systems (EPIQ), Galasys PLC (GLS), IGATE Corp (IGTE), IMS Health Holdings (IMS), Infoblox (BLOX), Informatica LLC (INFA) and Intralinks Holdings (IL).



Who are Sysorex Global's key executives?

Sysorex Global's management team includes the folowing people: Nadir Ali, Chief Executive Officer, DirectorKevin Roy Harris, Chief Financial OfficerGeoffrey Lilien, Chief Executive Officer of Lilien Systems, DirectorSoumya Das, Chief Marketing OfficerWendy Loundermon, Vice President of Finance and President of the government services unitAbdul-Aziz Salloum, General Manager of Sysorex ArabiaKareem M. Irfan, Independent DirectorTanveer A. Khader, Independent DirectorLeonard A. Oppenheim Esq., Independent DirectorThomas L. Steding, Independent Director



How do I buy Sysorex Global stock? 

Shares of Sysorex Global can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Sysorex Global's stock price today?

One share of Sysorex Global stock can currently be purchased for approximately $0.57.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ INPX)Community Ranking:  3.6 out of 5 (  )Outperform Votes:  81 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  30 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  111MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Sysorex Global and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 1 Hold RatingConsensus Rating:Hold (Score: 2.00)Consensus Price Target: $3.25 (471.43% upside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails5/17/2017B. RileyDowngradeNeutral$3.25Medium3/11/2016Dougherty & CoLower Price TargetBuy$2.00 -> $1.20N/A(Data available from 8/3/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)Earnings History by Quarter for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ INPX)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails8/10/2017        11/14/2016Q316($0.11)($0.14)$17.42 million$11.20 millionViewN/A8/11/2016Q216($0.08)($0.11)$16.90 million$13.30 millionViewListen5/12/2016Q1($0.10)($0.11)$15.76 million$14.10 millionViewListen5/7/2015Q1 2015($0.03)($0.10)$14.12 millionViewN/A11/13/2014Q314($0.06)($0.11)$13.94 million$14.28 millionViewN/A8/14/2014Q214($0.04)($0.01)$17.81 million$17.15 millionViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: ($1.90)QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20171($0.87)($0.87)($0.87)Q2 20171($0.62)($0.62)($0.62)Q3 20171$0.13$0.13$0.13Q4 20171($0.54)($0.54)($0.54)(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Dividend History for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)No dividend announcements for this company have been tracked by MarketBeat.com


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)Insider Ownership Percentage: 24.00%Institutional Ownership Percentage: 4.90%Insider Trades by Quarter for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails8/19/2016Kevin Roy HarrisCFOBuy10,000$0.43$4,300.00  8/17/2016Craig Allen HarperInsiderBuy9,000$0.45$4,050.00  6/13/2016Geoffrey LilienDirectorBuy40,000$0.50$20,000.00  5/20/2016Bret OsbornInsiderBuy50,000$0.44$22,000.00  5/19/2016Bret OsbornInsiderBuy15,000$0.41$6,150.00  12/17/2015Kevin Roy HarrisCFOBuy5,000$0.59$2,950.00  12/4/2015Craig Allen HarperCTOBuy6,000$0.72$4,320.00  11/18/2015Nadir AliCEOBuy21,500$0.66$14,190.00  11/11/2015Kevin Roy HarrisCFOBuy7,000$0.73$5,110.00  4/15/2014Geoffrey LilienCEOSell166,667$5.58$930,001.86  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)


Latest Headlines for Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineInpixon Joins ng Connect Program to Advance the Adoption and Development of Indoor Positioning Analyticsfinance.yahoo.com - August 2 at 11:33 PMInpixon Announces Technology Refresh Deal With Leading Beverage Distributorfinance.yahoo.com - July 26 at 8:09 PMInpixon Expanding Offering of Canon USA’s RadPRO SecurPASS Security Screening Systemfinance.yahoo.com - July 20 at 11:46 PMHead-To-Head Survey: Sysorex Global (NASDAQ:INPX) & PFSweb (PFSW)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 19 at 10:44 AMInpixon Offerings Added to NASA SEWP V Government-wide Strategic Solutions (GSS) for Laptops and Monitorsfinance.yahoo.com - July 18 at 2:21 AMInpixon is Approved for the Army Consolidated Buy Number 25finance.yahoo.com - July 13 at 3:17 AMSysorex Global (INPX) Rating Increased to Hold at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 12 at 10:16 PMToday's Research Reports on Stocks to Watch: Inpixon and Marinus Pharmaceuticalsfinance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 7:59 PMInpixon Completes $6,000,000 Underwritten Public Offeringfinance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 7:59 PMInpixon Prices $6,000,000 Underwritten Public Offeringfinance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 12:14 AMInpixon Gains Channel Partner Momentum with Indoor Positioning Analytics and Security Offeringfinance.yahoo.com - June 30 at 12:14 AMInpixon Launches Underwritten Public Offeringfinance.yahoo.com - June 28 at 7:25 PMInpixon Announces Webinar with Leading Expert to Address Internet of Things Security Risks and Best Practicesfinance.yahoo.com - June 19 at 12:22 PMInpixon Selected by Finance Factors to Protect Consumer Data and Privacyfinance.yahoo.com - June 12 at 6:33 PMInpixon :INPX-US: Earnings Analysis: Q1, 2017 By the Numbers : May 24, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 24 at 11:31 AMB. Riley Lowers Inpixon (INPX) to Neutralwww.americanbankingnews.com - May 17 at 9:44 PMInpixon (INPX) Stock Rating Lowered by B. Rileywww.americanbankingnews.com - May 13 at 11:32 AMB. Riley Downgrades Inpixon (INPX) to Neutral, "Multiple Vendors And Distributors Restrict Access To Credit"www.streetinsider.com - May 12 at 6:37 PMMid-Afternoon Market Update: Inpixon Drops Following Q1 Results; Technical Communications Shares Spike Higherfeeds.benzinga.com - May 12 at 3:52 PMInpixon's (INPX) Buy Rating Reiterated at B. Rileywww.americanbankingnews.com - May 12 at 3:30 PMInpixon EPS of -$2.03seekingalpha.com - May 11 at 6:33 PMInpixon Reports Financial Results for the First Quarter Ended March 31, 2017 and Provides Corporate Updatefinance.yahoo.com - May 11 at 6:33 PMInpixon Presenting at 2017 STORE Retail Conferencefinance.yahoo.com - May 9 at 12:24 PMInpixon to Announce First Quarter 2017 Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Thursday, May 11, 2017finance.yahoo.com - May 8 at 5:34 PMInpixon Announces Purchase Order From Leading Health Insurerfinance.yahoo.com - May 8 at 5:34 PMInpixon :INPX-US: Earnings Analysis: Q4, 2016 By the Numbers : April 27, 2017finance.yahoo.com - April 27 at 6:29 PMInpixon (INPX) Receives "Buy" Rating from B. Rileywww.americanbankingnews.com - April 23 at 3:16 PMB. Riley Comments on Inpixon's Q1 2017 Earnings (INPX)www.americanbankingnews.com - April 21 at 8:05 AMZacks.com featured highlights: Mateon Therapeutics, Emerge Energy Services, Cobalt International Energy and Inpixonfinance.yahoo.com - April 19 at 11:23 AMInpixon's (INPX) CEO Nadir Ali on Q4 2016 Results - Earnings Call Transcriptseekingalpha.com - April 18 at 11:01 AMInpixon (INPX) Secures Contract Renewal with FBIwww.streetinsider.com - April 18 at 11:01 AM4 Breakout Stocks Offering Amazing Returnsfinance.yahoo.com - April 18 at 11:01 AMFBI Renews Contract with Inpixon Federalfinance.yahoo.com - April 18 at 11:01 AMInpixon Reports Fourth Quarter and 2016 Financial Results And Provides Corporate Updatefinance.yahoo.com - April 17 at 5:19 PMInpixon to Announce 2016 Fiscal Year End Financial Results and Provide Company Update on Monday, April 17, 2017finance.yahoo.com - April 13 at 10:05 AMInpixon Announces Appointment of Zaman Khan as President of Inpixon Federal - Yahoo Financefinance.yahoo.com - April 11 at 11:52 AMInpixon Announces Appointment of Zaman Khan as President of Inpixon Federalfinance.yahoo.com - April 11 at 11:52 AMB. Riley Reaffirms "Buy" Rating for Inpixon (INPX)www.americanbankingnews.com - April 9 at 11:50 AMInpixon (INPX) Rating Reiterated by B. Rileywww.americanbankingnews.com - April 8 at 9:53 PMInpixon (INPX) Upgraded at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - April 6 at 11:37 PMEquities Analysts Offer Predictions for Inpixon's Q1 2017 Earnings (INPX)www.americanbankingnews.com - April 6 at 1:37 PMInpixon (INPX) Downgraded by Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - April 3 at 9:26 AMZacks Investment Research Lowers Inpixon (INPX) to Sellwww.americanbankingnews.com - April 1 at 3:30 PMInpixon +9.7% on Army contract extensionseekingalpha.com - March 29 at 6:29 PMInpixon (INPX) Secures Contract Extension with U.S. Armywww.streetinsider.com - March 29 at 6:29 PM9:30 am Inpixon announces that the Army Contracting Command was renewed for its second ordering period; co will continue to perform on the current task order with a Firm Fixed Price amount of $1.9 mlnus.rd.yahoo.com - March 29 at 6:29 PMInpixon (INPX) Secures Contract Extension with US Army - StreetInsider.comwww.streetinsider.com - March 29 at 10:33 AMU.S. Army Extends Contract with Inpixonfinance.yahoo.com - March 29 at 10:33 AMInpixon (NASDAQ: INPX): At the Intersection of IoT and Big Datafinance.yahoo.com - March 24 at 9:40 AMZacks: Analysts Set $26.24 Price Target for Inpixon (INPX)www.americanbankingnews.com - March 22 at 10:26 AM


Social





Chart
Sysorex Global (INPX) Chart for Thursday, August, 3, 2017




This page was last updated on 8/3/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff













































  SYRX Stock Quote - Inpixon - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Inpixon   SYRX:US      Ticker Change   SYRX:US has changed to a new ticker symbol   USD             Volume   0    Previous Close   3.525                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Previous Close   3.525    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding   -    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Information Technology   % Price Change -0.16%     Industry Software & Services   % Price Change +0.07%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.     2/28/2017   Sysorex Announces Favorable Decision from the Nasdaq Hearings Panel     2/23/2017   Sysorex Named to 2017 CRN MSP Elite 150 List    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Inpixon operates as a technology product company. The Company provides indoor positioning and data analytics to improve security, manage assets, and discover opportunities by combining data from the physical and digital worlds. Inpixon serves the airports, shopping malls, office buildings, and government agencies worldwide.    Address  1200 E Route 66 Ste 104Glendora, CA 91740United States   Phone  1-626-915-0001   Website   www.inpixon.com     Executives Board Members    Nadir Ali  Chief Executive Officer    Kevin R Harris  Chief Financial Officer    Craig Harper  Chief Technology Officer    Soumya Das  Chief Marketing Officer    Bret Osborn  Chief Sales Officer     Show More         




Product and Services Resources from Sysorex | Sysorex























































































PartnersGovernment ContractsLogin















ProductsAirPatrolLightMinerShoomServicesProfessional ServicesEngineering & Data ScienceCommunity HubSolutionsCorrectionsGovernmentHealthcareRetail PropertiesSafety & SecuritySupportCompanyManagementBoard of DirectorsInvestorsNews & EventsBlogCareersContact Us






















Resources








			Product Resources		


Sysorex 


			2016-09-05T12:19:46+00:00		

Additional Materials
Brochures, datasheets, use cases and videos for the Sysorex product families
Jump to: AirPatrol | LightMiner | Shoom




AirPatrol uRTLS Platform




AirPatrol uRTLS Master Brochure
Main brochure for the AirPatrol uRTLS platform
Download


AirPatrol for Healthcare
AirPatrol uRTLS asset management and safety in hospitals and heathcare facilities
Download


AirPatrol for Retail Properties
AirPatrol for foot traffic and flow analysis, location-based marketing and revenue generation for malls and shopping centers
Download


AirPatrol for Security
AirPatrol for detection and locationing of cellular, Wi-Fi and Bluetooth devices for physical securiity and safety
Download


Sensor Datasheets


4000SE Series
AirPatrol 4000SE Series (Cellular / Wi-Fi / Bluetooth) sensor datasheet
Download


ZD3030 Series
AirPatrol ZD3030 series (Cellular / Wi-Fi) sensor datasheet
Download


ZD3050 Series
AirPatrol ZD3050 series (Cellular / Wi-Fi / Bluetooth) sensor datasheet
Download


RDS3030 Series
AirPatrol series 3030 Rapid Deployment System (RDS) datasheet
Download


RDS3050 Series
AirPatrol series 3050 Rapid Deployment System (RDS) datasheet
Download


Use Cases


AirPatrol for Healthcare
AirPatrol uRTLS for unified cellular, Wi-Fi, Bluetooth asset management and safety
Download


AirPatrol for Retail
Mall visitor insight & interaction
Download


AirPatrol for Retail
Mixed-Use Customer Experience management
Download


AirPatrol for Retail
Mixed-Use Commercial Facilities management
Download


AirPatrol for Retail
Public Space Staffing and asset management for commercial retail centers
Download


AirPatrol for Security
Apparel Manufacturer – how a manufacturer secures R&D and enforces “no-cellphone” zones within its facility
Download


AirPatrol for Security
Corrections and Law Enforcement – how prisons and jails ensure safety and security by eliminating contraband cellphone use ithin the facility
Download


AirPatrol for Security
Public Space Security – Enhancing safety with real time detection and locationing of cellular, Wi-Fi and Bluetooth devices
Download


AirPatrol for Security
Secure Boardrooms – Enhancing secure board and conference room facilities to enforce “no video” and “no recording” policies
Download


Video


AirPatrol uRTLS
An overview of the AirPatrol Unified Real Time Location Platform
Watch


AirPatrol for Security
An overview of AirPatrol for Security used to secure corporate board rooms, R&D labs and sensitive areas
Watch









LightMiner Data Analytics Platform




LightMiner Brochure
Product overview brochure for the LightMiner Data Analytics Plaform
Download


LightMiner Datasheet
Single page datasheet on the LightMiner Data Analytics Platform
Download


Big Data Video
The story of Mr. A. Salam Qureishi, Sysorex founder and inventor of the first pro sports data analytics-based player draft.
Watch (via ESPN)









Shoom ePublishing Solutions




eTearsheets Brochure
Overview of the Shoom eTearsheets management system for the Shoom eSolutions platform
Download


eInvoice Brochure
Overview of the eInvoice management system for the Shoom eSolutions platform
Download


ePublication Brochure
Overview of the ePublication management system for the Shoom eSolutions platform
Download








ProductsAirPatrol

AirPatrol for Healthcare
AirPatrol for Retail Properties
AirPatrol for Security


LightMiner
Shoom

adDelivery
eInvoice
ePublication
eTearsheets


Product Resources

White Papers




 
 

 
 
 
 


















A Highly Disruptive Internet of Things (IOT) Company - Sysorex GlobalHomeMailSearchNewsFinanceSportLifestyleCelebrityMoviesWeatherFlickrMoreYahooSearchSearchSign inSingapore Markets open in 8 hrs 29 minsStraits Times Index3,342.92-5.88 (-0.18%)Nikkei20,029.26-50.78 (-0.25%)Hang Seng27,531.01-76.37 (-0.28%)A Highly Disruptive Internet of Things (IOT) Company - Sysorex GlobalAccesswire27 February 2017ReblogShareTweetSharePALO ALTO, CA / ACCESSWIRE / February 27, 2017 / Sysorex Global (SYRX) (or the Company) headquartered in Palo Alto, CA, provides data analytics and location-based solutions and services to commercial and government customers worldwide. The Company operates through 4 business segments: Mobile, IoT & Big Data Products; Storage and Computing; Software-as-a-service (SaaS); and Professional Services that should generate revenues over $100 million in 2017 based on its most recent acquisition of Integrio Technologies. Sysorex's high-margin proprietary product offerings include AirPatrol, LightMiner, and Shoom. The Company also provides professional services and third-party infrastructure products, which make up its primary revenue stream.AirPatrolAirPatrol is a unified, real-time location platform, designed to deliver simultaneous locationing and asset tracking information with several patents awarded and pending. AirPatrol provides its clients with the ability to provide exact details and analysis for virtually any (and every) cellular, Wi-Fi, and Bluetooth-enabled device moving throughout a given space. AirPatrol currently has three main applications: Retail, Healthcare and Security.By adopting AirPatrol's technology, clients can benefit from the following:Simplification of tracking multiple asset types - AirPatrol is a single platform for locating & tracking all cellular, Wi-Fi, and Bluetooth devices, regardless of make, manufacturer or device type. This is ideal for hospitals that have multiple proprietary asset tracking systems that they can now manage in one place.Improvements in security - in secure locations with "no cellphone" policies, AirPatrol locates any rogue or unknown devices. Sysorex has deployed in many government agencies replacing existing wi-fi vendors that can only provide a partial solution.Improvements in efficiencies - quickly locate assets and minimize downtime.Reducing equipment loss - eliminate equipment loss, theft and misuse.Identifying new revenue opportunities - AirPatrol delivers accurate footfall, dwell time and traffic-flow analysis in and around malls, airports, casinos, etc., providing the data for retail clients to uncover new revenue-generating opportunities through marketing campaigns; optimizing operations; negotiating leases more effectively; provide additional security, etc.View photosSource: SysorexLightMinerSysorex's LightMiner is a high performance, supercomputing platform, designed to provide its clients with the fastest and most complete data analytics platform in the world. The Company promotes LightMiner as being able to accelerate the most complex analysis by 20X to1000x depending on the application.LightMiner utilizes a number of the latest technological advances, coupled with the Company's proprietary technologies. The result is an extremely fast & powerful, cloud-based, low cost, and easy to use data analytics platform, capable of working with 3rd party software. There are many use cases for LightMiner in Banking, Cyber Security, Government, IoT, Retail/Property Management and Scientific Computing. Sysorex is initially leveraging it for its AirPatrol product to provide real-time data analytics.ShoomSysorex's Shoom suite of products provides electronic solutions (eSolutions) for publishers and advertisers, and is the industry's most comprehensive digital solution. The Shoom suite of products includes electronic tearsheets, invoicing, ad-delivery and publication. There is also tremendous value in the data that Shoom collects on ads and shopping trends across the approximately 700 newspaper customers it services.Read MoreProfessional ServicesSysorex's Professional Services Group serves customers in a wide range of industries and have expertise in big data & analytics, cloud services, data centers (modernization, consolidation & technology solutions), disaster recovery, and data migration services.Summary:Sysorex (SYRX) provides unique indoor-location and analytics products and solutions to help organizations secure, digitize and optimize their premises and to connect the physical and digital world. Their patented AirPatrol technology detects cellular, wifi and Bluetooth devices anonymously providing valuable insights to their customers. As the world continues to adopt Internet of Things (IoT) technologies, along with producing and capturing ever-increasing amounts of data, Sysorex appears well positioned to capitalize on the growing need of businesses and governments to monitor and utilize this data. It is leveraging its Infrastructure and Professional Services business with its revenues expected in $100M range to cross sell and invest in its high margin proprietary products and grow that business. Upon your personal due-diligence, we believe you will find SYRX a compelling investment opportunity.Disclaimers & Disclosures: For a full list of disclaimers and disclosures, please visit: http://sylvacap.com/disclaimerContact: info@sylvacap.comSOURCE: Sylva International LLCView photosReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to read nextBest companies to work for in Singapore 2017ZUU onlineStart Living The Millionaire LifestyleTorOptionSponsoredSeeking a dream, Indonesian family finds nightmare in RaqqaAssociated PressIt’s time Uber gave up on conquering the worldQuartzThe HBO hackers stole 'thousands' of internal company documents, and 7 times as much data as the Sony attackBusiness InsiderHow to Get Paid $356 Everyday Without a Job!BinaryUnoSponsoredShire may spin off hyperactivity drugs, raises forecastsReutersMalaysia central bank urged to reopen probe on indebted fundAssociated PressFTSE climbs to one-week high as BoE stays putReutersCar park and retail unit at People’s Park Complex for sale at $55 milThe Edge PropertyScientists ID tiny prehistoric sea worm with 50 head spinesAssociated PressPound plunges as Bank of England holds interest rates and cuts growth forecast on 'Super Thursday'The TelegraphBe Prepared for Inclement WeatherMarketwired10 Places To Get A Healthy Lunch For Less than S$10 in the CBDZUU onlineESI Releases SYSTUS 2017 Dedicated to the Energy SectorBusiness WireThe best cheap mobile phone deals in AugustThe Telegraph













AirPatrol | Contact Us | Sysorex
























































































PartnersGovernment ContractsLogin















ProductsAirPatrolLightMinerShoomServicesProfessional ServicesEngineering & Data ScienceCommunity HubSolutionsCorrectionsGovernmentHealthcareRetail PropertiesSafety & SecuritySupportCompanyManagementBoard of DirectorsInvestorsNews & EventsBlogCareersContact Us






















Contact









 





			Contact		


Lauren Edwards 


			2012-07-31T02:17:58+00:00		

How to Contact AirPatrol

HEADQUARTERS
AirPatrol Corp.
8171 Maple Lawn Boulevard
Suite 310
Maple Lawn, MD 20759 USA
1-410-290-3446
Email This Office


WEST COAST REGIONAL
AirPatrol Corp.
2175 Salk Avenue
Suite 150
Carlsbad, CA 92008 USA
1-410-290-3446
View Location Map
Email This Office


RESEARCH & DEVELOPMENT
AirPatrol Research Corp.
2963 Glen Drive
Suite 405
Coquitlam, BC V3B 2P7 Canada
View Location Map
Email This Office


ASIA PACIFIC REGION
11/78 Reserve Road
Artarmon NSW 2064
Canberra: +612 6188 4439
Dubai: +971 509 563 273
Melbourne: +613 9044 1948
View Location Map
Email This Office


PRODUCT SUPPORT
1-410-290-3446 ext. 4
(Available 8 am to 8 pm EST)
Email This Office


LATIN AMERICA REGION
Sao Paulo, Brazil
+1-410-290-3446 ext. 204
+55-11-99217-2538
Email This Office


 

Contact Form





















Archives Archives

Select Month
 February 2017 
 January 2017 
 December 2016 
 November 2016 
 October 2016 
 September 2016 
 August 2016 
 July 2016 
 June 2016 
 May 2016 
 April 2016 
 March 2016 
 February 2016 
 January 2016 
 December 2015 
 November 2015 
 October 2015 
 September 2015 
 August 2015 
 July 2015 
 June 2015 
 May 2015 
 April 2015 
 March 2015 
 February 2015 
 January 2015 
 December 2014 
 November 2014 
 October 2014 
 September 2014 
 August 2014 
 July 2014 
 June 2014 
 May 2014 
 April 2014 
 March 2014 
 February 2014 
 January 2014 
 December 2013 
 November 2013 
 October 2013 
 September 2013 
 August 2013 
 July 2013 
 June 2013 
 May 2013 
 April 2013 
 March 2013 
 February 2013 
 January 2013 
 December 2012 
 November 2012 
 October 2012 
 September 2012 
 August 2012 
 July 2012 
 April 2012 
 January 2012 
 December 2011 
 November 2011 
 October 2011 
 September 2011 
 August 2011 
 July 2011 
 June 2011 
 May 2011 
 April 2011 

Recent PostsSysorex Announces Favorable Decision from the Nasdaq Hearings Panel Sysorex Named to 2017 CRN MSP Elite 150 List Inside Sales Manager Content Writer Administrative Assistant  Subscribe Now!

The latest Sysorex blogs delivered to your email inbox
 

							Your Email Address						











Contacts Media Inquiries:
Lauren Edwards
+1 (410) 794-1213
lauren.edwards@sysorex.com
Investor Relations:
CorProminence LLC
Scott Arnold
+1 (516) 222-2560
Managing Director
www.corprominence.com

 
 
 

 
 
 
 


















